<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88928-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-28-88.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 188 / Wednesday, September 28,1988 / Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Parts 124, 264, 265 and 270 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL 3388-2] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Permit Modifications for Hazardous Waste Management Facilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) is todayamending its regulations under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act(RCRA) governing modifications of hazardous waste management permits. Today'sfinal rule establishes new procedures that apply to changes that facilityowners and operators may want to make at their facilities. EPA has categorizedselected permit modifications into three classes and established administrativeprocedures for approving modifications in each of these classes. The purposeof these amendments is to provide owners and operators more flexibilityto change specified permit conditions, to expand public notification andparticipation opportunities, and to allow for expedited approval if nopublic concern exists for a proposed permit modification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>October 28, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>The public docket for this rulemaking is available forpublic inspection in Room S-212, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency,401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460, from 9:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m., Mondaythrough Friday, excluding Federal holidays. The docket number is F-87-PMHP-FFFFF.The public must make an appointment to review docket materials by calling(202) 475-9327. The public may copy a maximum of 50 pages of material fromany one regulatory docket at no cost; additional copies cost $0.20 perpage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>RCRA hotline at (800) 424-9346(in Washington, DC call 382-3000) or Wayne Roepe, Office of Solid Waste(WH-563), U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, Washington, DC 20460, telephone(202) 475-7245.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Preamble Outline </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">I. Authority </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">II. Background </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">A. Need for Revisions to Modification Process </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">B. Regulatory Negotiation </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">III. Summary of Today's Rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">IV. Discussion of Final Rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">A. Modification, Revocation, and Reissuance of Permits </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">B. Procedures for Classes 1, 2, and 3 Modifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">1. Class 1 Modifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">2. Class 2 Modifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> i. Public Notification </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> ii. Deadlines for Agency Decisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> iii. Preconstruction </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">3. Class 3 Modifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">4. Other Permit Modifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">5. Temporary Authorizations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">6. Notification Requirements and Permit Modification Appeals </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">7. Newly Listed or Identified Wastes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">8. Publication of Permit Modification List </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">C. Classification of Permit Modifications </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">1. Change of Facility Owner or Operator </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">2. General Permit Provisions </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">3. General Facility Standards </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">4. Ground-Water Protection </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">5. Different Wastes in a Unit </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">6. General Approach to Defining Unit-Specific Changes </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> i. Tanks and Containers </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> ii. Surface Impoundments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> iii. Waste Piles </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> iv. Landfills </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> v. Land Treatment Units </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24"> vi. Incinerators </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">7. Closure </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">8. Post-Closure </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">9. HSWA Corrective Action </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">10. Location of Minor Modifications in Today's Rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">D. Conforming Changes to Permitting Regulations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">V. Other Issues </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">A. Permit Modification Form </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VI. State Authority </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">A. Applicability of Rules in Authorized States </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">B. Effect on State Authorizations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">C. State Authorization Options </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VII. Effective Date </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">VIII. Regulatory Analysis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">A. Regulatory Impact Analysis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">B. Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Authority </ITAG>These regulations are promulgated under the authority of sections 2002(a),3004, 3005, and 3006 of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, asamended, 42 U.S.C. 6912(a), 6924, 6925, and 6926.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background </ITAG>Subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) createsa ``cradle-to-grave'' management system designed to ensure that hazardouswaste is identified and properly transported, stored, treated, and disposed.Subtitle C requires EPA to identify hazardous waste and promulgate standardsfor generators and transporters of such waste. Under section 3004 of RCRA,owners and operators of treatment, storage, and disposal facilities arerequired to comply with standards ``necessary to protect human health andthe environment.'' These standards are generally implemented initiallythrough ``interim status'' requirements and later through permits issuedunder authorized State programs or by EPA. Section 3005(a) of the RCRA prohibits all treatment, storage, and disposalof hazardous waste except in accordance with a permit issued under an authorizedState program or by EPA. However, recognizing that the issuance of permitscan be time-consuming, Congress created ``interim status'' for facilitiesin existence on the effective date of EPA's permitting regulations (November19, 1980) or on the effective date of statutory or regulatory changes thatsubject a facility to the RCRA permit requirement. The hazardous waste management regulatory system established by EPA onMay 19, 1980, recognized that permits issued to treatment, storage, ordisposal facilities would need to be modified for various reasons duringthe life of the permit (normally ten years). Accordingly, the Agency establishedtwo different processes for modifying permits: major and minor modifications(40 CFR 270.41 and 270.42). Under that system the majority of permit changesfollowed the major modification procedures, including development of adraft permit, public notice, and opportunity for a public hearing as requiredunder 40 CFR Part 124. These procedures are the same as for initial permitissuance, except that the scope of public participation is limited to thespecific permit conditions being modified. The minor modification regulationsallow EPA or authorized States to make a limited set of minor changes inRCRA permits with the consent of the permit holder without triggering theprocedures of Part 124. A. Need for Revisions to Modification Process After several years of experience with permitted facilities, EPA and authorizedStates have found that in many cases the current permit modification regulationsare unnecessarily restrictive and seriously hamper the implementation ofthe permitting program. EPA has found that the modification proceduresare time-consuming and resource-intensive, even for routine and administrativematters. The result has been to delay or discourage facility changes, manyof which would lead to improved management of hazardous wastes. The Agency believes that permits must be viewed as living documents thatcan be modified to allow facilities to make technological improvements,comply with new environmental standards, respond to changing waste streams,and generally improve waste management practices. Since permits are usuallywritten for ten years of operation, the facility or the permit writer cannotanticipate all or even most of the administrative, technical, or operationalchanges required over the permit term for the facility to maintain an up-to-dateoperation. Therefore, permit modifications are inevitable. In fact, EPAestimates that many permits may have to be modified two or three timesa year. In the past several years, EPA, States, permittees, and members of thepublic have recognized that current procedures must be revised to allowgreater flexibility in modifying permits. The need for greater flexibilityis becoming increasingly important as more permits are issued (particularlyin response to the permitting deadlines specified in the Hazardous andSolid Waste Amendments (HSWA) of 1984), leading to a corresponding increasein demand for permit modifications. In addition, regulatory developmentswill increase the demand for permit modifications. Unless EPA improvesthe permit modification procedures, significant EPA (and permit holder)resources will be spent on making minor permit changes, and will be divertedfrom more important tasks. More important, perhaps, improvements in thehandling and treatment of hazardous waste will be delayed, and the regulatedcommunity will find itself unable to obtain modified permit conditionsin a timely manner. The net result could well be an increased threat tohuman health and the environment and a growing shortfall in hazardous wastetreatment, storage, and disposal capacity. B. Regulatory Negotiation In mid-1986, EPA communicated with various parties interested in developinga new approach to permit modifications, including hazardous waste generatorsand representatives from the waste management industry, State governments,and environmental and citizen groups. EPA established a committee underthe Federal Advisory Committee Act to negotiate the provisions of the standard.At the final meeting on February 24, 1987, 18 of the 19 Committee membersreached agreement on the major provisions of a permit modification proposal.The signed Committee statement has been included in the public docket forthis rule. This agreement was the basis for the Agency's proposed ruleon September 23, 1987 (52 FR 35838). EPA received over 50 comments on thatproposal. The Agency has carefully analyzed those comments and made changesas appropriate in promulgating today's rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Summary of Today's Rule </ITAG>EPA is today revising the regulations governing permit modifications (40CFR 270.41 and 270.42) to incorporate a process that better accommodatesthe different types of modifications. The revisions provide both ownersand operators and EPA more flexibility to change specified permit conditions,expand public notification and participation opportunities, and allow forexpedited approval if no public concern exists regarding a proposed change.Today's rule addresses only modifications requested by a permittee. Itdoes not change the procedures for modifications sought solely by the regulatoryAgency. The rule restructures andSection;andSection; 270.41 and 270.42, whichcurrently specify the major and minor modification procedures, respectively.The rule alters andSection; 270.41 so that it applies only to modificationsthat are initiated by the authorized Agency; the current major modificationprocedures for these changes remain in effect. The rule alters andSection;270.42 to refer only to modifications requested by the permittee, and establishesthree classes of modifications within this universe. As defined in revised andSection; 270.42, Class 1 and 2 permittee-requestedmodifications do not substantially alter existing permit conditions orsignificantly affect the overall operation of the facility. Class 1 coversroutine changes, such as changing typographical errors, upgrading plansand records maintained by the facility, or replacing equipment with functionallyequivalent equipment. Class 2 modifications address common or frequentlyoccurring changes needed to maintain a facility's capability to managewastes safely or to conform with new regulatory requirements. Class 3 modificationscover major changes that substantially alter the facility or its operations.Procedures differ among these three classes of permittee-requested modifications.Class 1 changes are generally allowed without prior Agency approval. Ownersand operators must, however, notify the public and the authorized Agencyonce they have made these changes. In some cases, which are indicated inAppendix I to 40 CFR Part 270, prior Agency approval is required. Withcause, the Agency may reject any Class 1 modification. Class 2 modifications begin with a modification request to the authorizedAgency, public notice by the facility owner of a modification request,an informational meeting between the owner and the public, and a 60-daycomment period. Within 90 days of receipt of a request for a Class 2 modificationrequest, the Agency must approve or deny the request; extend the reviewperiod 30 days; or approve a temporary authorization for up to 180 days.If the Agency does not take action by the end of the 30-day extension,the changes specified in the modification request are automatically authorizedfor a period of 180 days. If the Agency has not acted by the end of the180-day period, the changes are authorized for the duration of the permit.This mechanism for automatic authorization, which has become known as the``default'' provision, is designed to provide reasonable certainty to facilityowner/operators that Class 2 modification requests will be acted on expeditiously.Prompt consideration of modification requests is necessary to allow facilitiesto plan effectively for the future and to upgrade or modify facility conditionsquickly in response to changing conditions. The rule also allows the facilityto begin construction of a Class 2 modification 60 days after the modificationis requested, although such construction would be at the permittee's ownrisk if the modification request is ultimately denied. This is known asthe ``preconstruction'' provision. Finally, if the proposed Class 2 modificationraises significant public interest or Agency concern about protection ofhuman health or the environment, then the Agency can require that the Class3 procedures be followed instead. Class 3 modifications are subject to the same initial public notice andmeeting requirements as Class 2 modifications. However, the default andpreconstruction provisions of Class 2 do not apply. Furthermore, an EPAdecision to grant the modification request is subject to the permit issuanceprocedures of 40 CFR Part 124. The Agency must prepare a draft permit modification,notify the public of the draft modification, hold a public hearing on themodification if requested, and grant or deny the request. The Agency is also changing the current permit modification requirementfor facilities that are handling a waste when that waste becomes newlylisted or is identified as hazardous. For Class 1 modifications, facilitiesmay make the necessary permit changes immediately as long as the facilityowner notifies EPA and the public of the changes. For Class 2 or Class3 modifications, the owner or operator may make the change without priorapproval; however, he or she must submit a complete permit modificationrequest within 180 days of the effective date of the rule designating thewaste as hazardous. Furthermore, for land disposal units, the owner oroperator would be required to certify compliance with all applicable ground-watermonitoring and financial responsibility requirements for that unit withinone year of the effective date. Today's rule also gives EPA the authority to grant temporary authorization,without prior public notice and comment, for activities that are necessaryfor facility owners and operators to respond promptly to changing conditions.Temporary authorizations, for terms ranging up to 180 days, may be grantedto Class 2 or Class 3 modifications that meet criteria specified in andSection;270.42(e). Owners and operators who apply for temporary authorizationsare required to notify the public. Temporary authorizations that involvemore permanent activities (i.e., activities that are intended to extendbeyond 180 days) are subject to Class 2 or Class 3 public participationprocedures for permit modifications. Appendix I to 40 CFR Part 270 contains a list of specific modificationsand assigns them to Class 1, 2, or 3. Permit modifications not listed inAppendix I may be submitted under Class 3. Alternatively, the permitteemay request a Class 1 or 2 determination from the Agency.For any final decision granting or denying a modification request, or forany temporary or permanent automatic authorization, the permittee and membersof the public have the same rights of appeal as provided for RCRA permitsin Part 124. EPA or an authorized State must maintain a listing of all approved permitmodifications and periodically publish a notice that the list is availablefor review. The Agency emphasizes that today's rule addresses the procedures for approvingpermit changes and for public participation regarding these changes. Thesubstantive standards that apply to the design and operation of the newactivities at a facility are not affected by today's proposal. Therefore,any permit modification, whether a Class 1, 2, or 3 change, will be subjectto the appropriate substantive Parts 264, 265, 268, and 269 requirements.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Discussion of Final Rule </ITAG>The following discussion of today's rule describes the new permit modificationprocedures and responds to the significant public comments received onthe proposal. In this discussion, the terms ``EPA,'' ``Agency,'' and ``permittingAgency'' have been used interchangeably to mean the appropriate permittingauthority (including the State agency, once it becomes authorized for thesenew procedures), that will be using these procedures for permit modifications.A. Modification, Revocation, and Reissuance of Permits EPA is today substantially restructuring andSection;andSection; 270.41 and270.42. As proposed on September 23, 1987, andSection; 270.41 now addressesonly those permit modifications initiated by the Agency. Section 270.42covers only changes requested by the permittee, and contains the relevantpermit modification classifications and procedures. Section 270.41, as promulgated today, identifies three causes for whichthe Agency might require a permit modification: Alterations or additionsto the permitted facility or activity; new information received by theAgency; or new standards, regulations, or judicial decisions affectingthe human health or environmental basis of a facility permit. All threeof these causes remain unchanged from the previous regulatory language,although the third cause_new regulations_was recently codified on December1987 (52 FR 45788). The current Part 124 permitting procedures would remainin effect for these changes. Commenters supported the use of andSection; 270.41 for modifications initiatedby the Agency. However, one commenter suggested that the permittee shouldalso have the option of voluntarily employing the appropriate Class 1,2, or 3 procedure as an alternative to the Part 124 permitting procedure.EPA agrees with this commenter, and points out that the language containedin today's rule would allow a permittee to request a permit modificationin accordance with the andSection; 270.42 procedures in anticipation of orin response to an Agency-initiated modification action. As a part of restructuring andSection; 270.41, today's rule deletes thoseportions of andSection; 270.41(a)(3) that would allow permittees to requestmajor modifications for changes made in response to new regulations orjudicial decisions. Permittees can still request such changes, but theprocedures are now contained in andSection; 270.42. Commenters supportedthis action. Several commenters expressed some concern that the revised language inandSection; 270.41(a)(3) removes the ``permit as a shield'' protection forpermittees. (<T3>See </T3>andSection; 270.4(a)). They characterized this action as onerousand unreasonable. The purpose of this ``permit as a shield'' provisionis to assure the permittee that by complying with the permit, he or sheis in full compliance with the RCRA facility standards. Therefore, standardswhich become effective after permit issuance usually are not incorporatedinto the permit until it expires and is reissued. However, the 1984 HSWA amendments require that certain statutory and regulatoryprovisions imposed by HSWA apply to all facilities, including those withpermits. To clarify the Agency's authority to reopen permits as necessaryto assure compliance with new regulations, EPA amended andSection; 270.41(a)(3)(December 1, 1987 (52 FR 45788)). As stated in the preamble to the December1 rule, this provision is intended only for significant amendments whichmay provide a substantial increase in the protection of human health orthe environment. The Agency believes that some confusion was created because both the September23rd proposal on permit modifications and the December codification ruleaddressed andSection; 270.41(a)(3). It is important to note that today'sfinal rule does not change the substantive requirements of this paragraph,as it was promulgated on December 1. It only modifies this paragraph bydeleting the procedures that relate to modifications requested by the permittee,since these procedures are now addressed in andSection; 270.42. This is consistentwith the September 23rd proposal.B. Procedures for Class 1, 2, and 3 Modifications <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Class 1 Modifications </ITAG>EPA is promulgating today's rule covering Class 1 modifications essentiallyas proposed. (<T3>See </T3>andSection; 270.42(a).) Class 1 modifications cover changesthat are necessary to correct minor errors in the permit, to upgrade plansand records maintained by the facility, or to make routine changes to thefacility or its operation. They do not substantially alter the permit conditionsor significantly affect the overall operation of the facility. Generally,these modifications include the correction of typographical errors; necessaryupdating of names, addresses, or phone numbers identified in the permitor its supporting documents; upgrading, replacement, or relocation of emergencyequipment; improvements of monitoring, inspection, recordkeeping, or reportingprocedures; updating of sampling and analytical methods to conform withrevised Agency guidance or regulations; updating of certain types of schedulesidentified in the permit; replacement of equipment with functionally equivalentequipment; and replacement of damaged ground-water monitoring wells. Thespecific modifications that fall into Class 1 are enumerated in AppendixI to 40 CFR Part 270. This Appendix is discussed more fully in SectionIV.C of this preamble. Section 270.42(a) specifies the approval procedures for Class I modifications.Under these procedures, the permittee may, at any time, put into effectany Class 1 modification that does not require prior Agency approval. Thepermittee is required to notify the Agency by certified mail or by anyother means that establish proof of delivery within seven calendar daysof making the change. The notice must specify the change being made tothe permit conditions or documents referenced in the permit and explainbriefly why it was necessary. However, there are several cases where priorapproval is required; these modifications are specifically identified inAppendix I. The permittee is also required to notify by mail persons on the facilitymailing list within 90 days of making the modification. The September 23,1987 proposal only specified a 14 day notification period. EPA receivedseveral comments from respondents who believe that the Class 1 notificationrequirements would be an unnecessary administrative burden. EPA is sympatheticto these concerns, but believes that it is important to keep the publicinformed of all changes at RCRA permitted facilities. In an effort to alleviatepotential burdens at facilities making frequent Class 1 changes or thathave extensive mailing lists, today's andSection; 270.42(a)(1)(ii) specifiesa maximum of 90 days to notify the public of such changes. This time periodwill allow permittees to cluster some of their notices and still providefor public notice of these relatively minor changes. EPA or an authorized State is currently required under 40 CFR 124.10(c)(viii)to compile and maintain a mailing list for each RCRA permitted facility.The list must include all persons who have asked in writing to be on thelist (for example, in response to public solicitations from the Agency).Also, it generally includes both local residents in the vicinity of thefacility and statewide organizations that have expressed interest in receivingsuch information on permit modifications. A facility owner under today'srule is responsible for obtaining from EPA or the authorized State a completefacility mailing list and for updating it by contacting the Agency periodically.However, it is also the permitting Agency's responsibility to periodicallyinform the facility of new additions to the list. The facility owner/operatorwould not be held responsible for failure to notify persons recently addedto the EPA list when the owner/operator has made a reasonable effort tokeep its list current. In today's rule, andSection; 270.42(a)(1)(ii) has been amended to requirethe permittee to send notices of Class 1 modifications to appropriate unitsof State and local government as specified in andSection; 124.10(c)(1)(ix).EPA solicited comment on this notification in the preamble to the proposal,and received support for the approach. It is important that all levelsof government that have jurisdiction over the area where the facility islocated remain informed of all changes in the facility permit and operation.(Note that similar changes have been made to notification procedures forClasses 2 and 3 modifications.) Although the permittee may make most Class 1 modifications without Agencyapproval or prior public notice, under andSection; 270.42(a)(iii) the publicmay ask the permitting Agency to review any Class 1 modification. In theevent such a review is conducted, if the Agency denies a Class 1 modificationrequest, the Agency shall notify the permittee in writing of this ruling,and the permittee is required to comply with the original permit conditions.Several commenters wanted a 30-day time period to return to compliancebecause of the time needed to make the changes. EPA does not believe aspecific time period is necessary. The changes listed as Class 1 are minorin nature and for the most part should be easily reversible. If a Class1 modification reversal by the Agency cannot be accomplished very quickly(e.g., a piece of equipment must be ordered), the permittee and the Agencycan agree to an appropriate schedule for completion. As proposed, EPA is allowing certain Class 1 modifications_such as changesin interim dates in schedules of compliance or minor changes in incineratortrial burns_only after the permitting Agency has approved the modification.This provision is contained in andSection; 270.42(a)(2). Those Class 1 modificationswhich require prior Agency approval are identified in Appendix I with anasterisk. This approval procedure is analogous to the former minor modificationprocedures. The permittee must notify persons on the facility mailing listwithin 90 calendar days after the Director approves the request. Several commenters asked for a specified timeframe for Agency decisionsfor the Class 1 modifications that require prior approval. Therefore, intoday's rule a new provision has been added at andSection; 270.42(a)(3) thatallows the permittee to elect to follow the Class 2 process instead ofthe Class 1 procedures. As discussed in the following section, the Class2 process will assure that an Agency decision will be made on the modificationrequest within established timeframes (generally 90 to 120 days). Thisapproach will also result in additional public participation regardingthe permittee's request. Furthermore, the deadlines in the Class 2 processbalance the concerns of the Agency, the public, and the permittee, andare readily adaptable to the types of facility changes encompassed in Class1.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Class 2 Modifications </ITAG>Class 2 modifications cover changes that are necessary to enable a permitteeto respond, in a timely manner, to (i) common variations in the types andquantities of the wastes managed under the facility permit, (ii) technologicaladvancements, and (iii) regulatory changes, where such changes can be implementedwithout substantially altering the design specifications or managementpractices prescribed by the permit. As specified in the rule, Class 2 modificationsinclude increases of 25 percent or less in a facility's non-land-basedtreatment or storage capacity, authorizations to treat or store new wastesthat do not require different unit design or management practices, andmodifications to improve the design of hazardous waste management unitsor improve management practices. The specific modifications that fall inClass 2 are identified in Appendix I to Part 270. This Appendix is discussedmore fully in Section IV.C of this preamble. Under andSection; 270.42(b)(1), a permittee who wishes to make a Class 2modification is required to submit to the Agency a modification requestdescribing the exact change to be made to the permit conditions. The permitteemust also submit supporting documents that identify the modification asa Class 2 modification, explain why the modification is needed, and providethe applicable information required by andSection;andSection; 270.13 through270.21, 270.62, and 270.63. EPA also recommends that the permittee discussthe modification with the Agency and the public before submission to helpeliminate unnecessary delays and denials. i. <T3>Public Notification. </T3>Under andSection; 270.42(b)(2), the permitteemust notify persons on the facility mailing list and appropriate unitsof State and local government, and he or she is also required to publisha notice in a local newspaper regarding the modification request. In theSeptember 23, 1987 proposal, these actions would occur on the date of submission.EPA received many comments on this subject. All the commenters favoredmore flexibility in the timing of the submission, the mailing, and thenewspaper publication. The Agency is today adopting one suggestion whichrequires the permittee to complete the mail and newspaper notifications7 calendar days before or after he or she submits the modification requestto the permitting Agency. This will allow a two week period to accomplishthe notifications, and makes coordination of necessary actions easier since,for example, some newspapers are not published on a daily basis. EPA believesthat this alternative provides the best compromise between flexibilityin timing the notice and assuring an adequate public comment period. However,if the newspaper publication is likely to occur before the modificationrequest is submitted to the Agency, it is important that the permitteeinform the Agency of the nature of the request prior to publication. Section 270.42(b)(2) specifies the information required in the notice:(i) Announcement of a 60-day comment period during which interested personsmay submit written comments to the permitting Agency; (ii) announcementof the date, time, and place for an informational public meeting; (iii)name and telephone number of the permittee's contact person whom the publiccan contact for information on the request; (iv) name and telephone numberof an Agency contact person whom the public could contact for informationabout the permit, the modification request, applicable regulatory requirements,permit modification procedures, and the permittee's compliance history;(v) information on viewing copies of the modification request and any supportingdocuments; and (vi) a statement that the permittee's compliance historyduring the life of the permit is available from the Agency's contact person.Section 270.42(b)(2) also requires the permittee to submit to the permittingAgency evidence that this notice was published in a local newspaper andmailed to persons on the facility mailing list. Finally, the permitteemust make a copy of the permit modification request and supporting documentsaccessible to the public in the vicinity of the permitted facility (forexample, at a public library, local government agency, or location undercontrol of the owner). One commenter suggested that the 60-day public comment period should beginwith the date of the newspaper notice rather than the date of submissionto the Agency. EPA agrees with this comment since the newspaper noticewill be the most easily determined date by the public. Therefore, andSection;270.42(b)(5) is modified in today's rule accordingly. This change in timingwill give all members of the public a full 60 days to respond to the modificationrequest.The permittee is required to hold an informational public meeting, whichis open to all members of the public, no fewer than 15 days after the startof the comment period, and at least 15 days before the end of the commentperiod. The purpose of this meeting is to enable the permittee and thepublic to exchange views and, to the extent possible, resolve any issuesraised by the permit modification request. An official transcript of thestatements made at the meeting is not required and the Agency is not obligatedto attend the meeting or respond to comments made at the meeting. However,it is expected that the meeting will lead to more informed written commentssubmitted to the Agency, and it may also result in voluntary revisionsin the permittee's modification request. The ``permittee's compliance history'' will be made available to the publicas provided in andSection; 270.42(b)(2)(vi). The regulation does not specificallydefine what would constitute a ``compliance history''; however, it shouldbe designed to give the public a sense of the way the facility has beenoperated during the permit term. For example, the compliance history couldbe a summary list of permit violations, dates that the violations occurred,and whether these violations have been corrected. It would not includeany instances where the allegations were dismissed, and would not containconfidential inspection reports or other confidential items not found inthe public record (e.g., sensitive information pertaining to a pendingenforcement action). One commenter recommended that the compliance history should contain onlythose items related to the requested modification. EPA disagrees. The purposeof the requirement is to provide the public an opportunity to learn theoverall record of the permitted facility. Restricting the requirement toitems related to the requested modification (which, in any case, wouldbe difficult to define) might lead to the omission of significant informationon the company's compliance record. ii. <T3>Deadlines for Agency Decisions. </T3>Section 270.42(b)(6) containsspecific procedures for Agency review and approval or denial of Class 2modification requests. Under andSection; 270.42(b)(6)(i), the Agency mustmake one of the following five decisions within 90 days of receiving themodification request: (i) Approve the request with or without changes;(ii) deny the request; (iii) determine that the modification request mustfollow the procedures for Class 3 modifications; (iv) approve the request,with or without changes, as a temporary authorization having a term ofup to 180 days; or (v) notify the permittee that it will make a decisionon the request within 30 days. If the permitting Agency notifies the permitteeof a 30-day extension for a decision (or, if it fails to make any of thedecisions), it must, by the 120th day after receiving the modificationrequest, make one of the following decisions: (i) Approve the request,with or without changes; (ii) deny the request; (iii) determine that themodification request must follow the procedures for Class 3 modifications;or (iv) approve the request as a temporary authorization for up to 180days. In addition, andSection; 270.42(b)(6)(vii) allows the Director to extendindefinitely, or for a specified period of time, the deadlines for actionon a Class 2 request if he or she obtains the written consent of the permittee.This option may be useful where the Director requests additional informationfrom the permittee or when the permittee wishes to conduct additional publicmeetings. This provision is unchanged from the proposal. If the Agency fails to make one of the four decisions listed above by the120th day, the activities described in the modification request, as submitted,are authorized for a period of 180 days as an ``automatic authorization''without Agency action. At any time during the term of the automatic authorization,however, the Agency may approve or deny the permit modification request.If the Agency does so, this action will terminate the automatic authorization.If the Agency has not acted on the modification request within 250 daysof receipt of the modification request (i.e., 50 days before the end ofthe automatic authorization), under andSection; 270.42(b)(6)(iv) the permitteemust notify persons on the facility mailing list within seven days, andmake a reasonable effort to notify other persons who submitted writtencomments, that the automatic authorization will become permanent unlessthe Agency acts to approve or deny it. If the Agency fails to approve ordeny the modification request during the term of the automatic authorization,the activities described in the modification request become permanentlyauthorized without Agency action on the day after the end of the term ofthe automatic authorization. (However, if the owner/operator fails to notifythe public when EPA has not acted on an automatic authorization 50 daysbefore its termination date, the clock on the automatic authorization willbe suspended. The permanent authorization will not go into effect until50 days after the public is notified. Until the permanent authorizationbecomes effective, the Agency may approve or deny the modification requestat any time. In addition, the owner/operator will be subject to potentialenforcement action.) This permanent authorization lasts for the life ofthe permit unless modified later by the permittee (under andSection; 270.42)or the Agency (under andSection; 270.41). This procedure for automatic authorizationis commonly referred to as the ``default'' provision. During the term of any automatic authorization, whether it was a temporaryauthorization occurring at day 120 or a permanent authorization at day300, the newly authorized activities are limited to those described inthe modification request. Furthermore, the permittee is required to complywith all applicable Part 265 standards during this term. These standardswould be enforceable by EPA or an authorized State, and any deviation fromthem_even if the deviation was explicitly described in the modificationrequest_would constitute a violation of Part 265.EPA received many comments on the subject of automatic authorizations.Many of the commenters supported the provision as proposed on September23, 1987, citing the need for assurances that certain limited changes atfacilities will not be precluded by failure of the permitting agency toact on the modification request on a timely basis. A number of commenters opposed this default provision, primarily becausethey believed that all permit modifications should undergo affirmativeAgency review and approval before they went into effect. They argued thatreview and approval by a permit writer was necessary to ensure that thepermittee in fact complied with applicable standards and provided a significantdegree of protection to the public. Several commenters agreed that it wasappropriate to impose a time limit on Agency decisions (e.g., 90 or 180days), but argued that the concept of an automatic authorization, wherethe Agency had not acted within the time period, was inappropriate. EPA acknowledges these concerns, but it continues to believe that the ``defaultprovision'' is a critical element in its new permit modification scheme.Without such a provision, the regulated industry will have no assurancethat the Agency will act expeditiously even on relatively limited changesthat are necessary to the ongoing operation of a facility and that, inmany cases, would upgrade public and environmental protection. Withoutsuch an assurance, the Agency believes that it will be difficult if notimpossible for many facilities to manage wastes safely and effectivelyin the increasingly complex world of hazardous waste management. The concept of automatic approvals has worked well in other EPA programs,such as EPA's review program for new chemicals under the Toxic SubstancesControl Act. This experience leads EPA to expect benefits, and not problems,from the automatic approval concept. Furthermore, it is balanced by significantlystrengthened procedures for public participation. EPA believes that automaticauthorization for limited types of modifications will contribute to a moreeffective and streamlined permitting program. At the same time, the safeguards built into today's rule will ensure thatClass 2 modifications receive sufficient review and that risks are limitedunder automatic authorizations. These safeguards include: (1) Limitationson the types of modifications that can be made under Class 2 procedures,(2) the Agency's authority to reject Class 2 modification requests becausethe applications are incomplete, or to require that they undergo Class3 procedures (a new requirement in this final rule), (3) the fact thatthe Agency has up to 300 days to revoke an automatic authorization, ifhuman health or environmental concerns are identified, and (4) the requirementthat activities under automatic authorizations comply with Part 265 requirements.As noted above, these safeguards include one significant new requirement,which EPA has included in response to commenters' concerns about the defaultprovision. Section 270.42(b)(6) has been amended to allow the Directorto determine that a Class 2 modification request should instead followthe Class 3 modification procedures. The Director may make this determinationby the 90-day deadline (or 120-day deadline, if extended) required forClass 2 modifications, provided that there is significant public concernabout the proposed modification or if he believes that the nature of thechange warrants the more extensive procedures of Class 3. Therefore, ifmembers of the public feel strongly that a Class 2 modification requestshould be subject to the Part 124 approval procedures contained in Class3, they can raise this issue with the Agency during the comment periodand express the reasons why the Class 2 process is not appropriate in theparticular case. In the proposed rule, EPA also solicited comment on another aspect of theautomatic authorization. Under the proposal, a <T3>temporary </T3>automatic authorization would become <T3>permanently </T3>authorized if the Agency had not acted by day 300.In contrast, however, if the Agency issued a temporary authorization byday 120, there was no provision for an automatic authorization if the Agencythen failed to make a final decision by the end of the temporary authorization.EPA requested comment on this seemingly inconsistent provision. Commentersexpressed concern that at the end of the 180-day temporary authorizationperiod the modification is, in effect, automatically denied if the Agencyfailed to take action to approve or deny the request. Commenters urgedEPA to apply the permanent authorization default at the conclusion of Agency-issuedtemporary authorizations. EPA agrees with these comments, and has incorporatedsuch a provision in andSection; 270.42(b)(6) (iv) and (v). Because of this change, it was also necessary to make some minor conformingchanges to the language in andSection; 270.42(b)(6)(iv) regarding the permittee'snotice to the public about the possibility of a permanent default. Thenotice is triggered if the Agency has not made a final decision by thedate 50 days before the end of the facility's automatic temporary or Agency-issuedtemporary authorization. Today's language has the same result as the proposal(which specified that the notice be triggered at day 250), but it alsoaccounts for those situations where a temporary authorization is issuedbefore day 120 (e.g., a temporary authorization issued on day 90). Thischange will assure that the public receives a 50-day advance notice ofa possible permanent authorization via the default mechanism. It is importantto ensure that members of the public have sufficient advance notice ofa potential permanent authorization so that they will have ample opportunityto press the permitting Agency for action to avoid a decision by default.This time period gives the Agency enough time to act in response to commentsbefore the permanent authorization occurs. Several commenters also argued against the Class 2 procedures because oftheir resource implications. One commenter, for example, contended thatthe procedures will strain EPA or state resources because they will requireextensive review time for low priority modifications. EPA disagrees withthis comment. Class 2 modifications represent a restricted category ofchanges, which should generally require a limited commitment of Agencyresources to review. The major difficulty the Agency would have in meetingthe 120-day deadline would be in situations where the facility owner oroperator had not provided complete information; in these cases, the Agencyhas the authority to deny the request. Similarly, in controversial casesthe Agency has the authority to require Class 3 procedures.Another commenter argued that there may be an incentive for permitteesto overload the system with many permit modification requests in the hopethat they would be automatically authorized. EPA, however, does not believethat this concern outweighs the benefits of the approach in today's rule.In the first place, the rule provides significant disincentives for sucha strategy by an owner or operator. The information requirements of Part270 will discourage less than serious requests. Furthermore, under Class2 procedures, the Agency can terminate an automatic authorization evenafter it has gone into effect, up to day 300 of the review. Therefore,facilities hoping to overwhelm the Agency with a large number of modificationrequests should recognize that the Agency would have almost a year to acton them, and that the disruption could be significant if a temporary authorizationwere revoked after the facility change had already been made. Finally,EPA is convinced that, if facilities confine Class 2 modification requeststo legitimate Class 2 modifications and provide all the required information,it will be able to keep up with the work load. Where facilities do notmeet the Class 2 requirements, the Agency will deny the request. EPA also received comments on the standards that should apply to facilitymodifications during an automatic authorization. The proposal requiredcompliance with the Part 265 standards at a minimum, and with Part 264to the extent practicable. Many commenters asserted that the self-implementingnature of Part 265 is appropriate in these circumstances where the Agencyhas not made changes to the permit conditions. EPA agrees with these comments,and upon further consideration is changing the appropriate references intoday's rule to require compliance with Part 265 only, in order to minimizeany possible confusion that could occur from a permittee trying to judgewhich Part 264 standards are ``practicable'' in his situation. iii. <T3>Preconstruction. </T3>The proposed rule allowed the facility owner/operatorto perform any construction necessary to implement a Class 2 change beforethe modification request is granted. A number of State and industry commenterssupported the preconstruction provision, saying that it will speed implementationof Class 2 modifications, and allow flexibility to plan and schedule activitiesbefore approval is granted. However, several commenters opposed the ideasince they believed that the permitting Agency would be less inclined todeny a modification that had already been constructed. EPA believes that preconstruction by the permittee, as allowed under thefinal rule, will not influence the permitting Agency's decision. Becauseof the limited nature of Class 2 modifications and the need for flexibilityin maintaining permits, preconstruction will be allowed for this categoryof modification. However, in order to balance these needs with the concernsexpressed by commenters, the preconstruction provision in today's finalrule has been substantially modified. (<T3>See </T3>andSection; 270.42(b)(9).) The date that construction can beginhas been set at 60 days after submission of the modification request, unlessthe Director establishes a different date. In contrast, the proposal wouldhave allowed construction immediately after the request was submitted.The new delayed construction date allows time for Agency and public reviewof the modification design, so that if the public raises concerns duringthe public comment period or if the Agency is likely to deny or changethe request, the permittee can be informed prior to construction. The second aspect of today's preconstruction provision allows the Directorto establish a preconstruction date of more than 60 days after applicationsubmission. This flexibility is needed for several reasons. First, situationsmay arise that warrant design changes in the permittee's proposal, andthe Director should be able to postpone all or part of the constructionuntil the final design is approved (although this should be infrequent,given the limited scope of Class 2 modifications). Another reason for thepermitting Agency to be able to delay construction stems from the new provisionin today's rule that would a low the Director to determine that a Class2 request should instead follow the Class 3 procedures. (See above preamblediscussion.) Since there is no preconstruction allowed with a Class 3 modification,and since the public has 60 days to comment and request that the permittee'sproposal follow the Class 3 procedures, the Director may not know by the60th day whether there is sufficient merit to require the Class 3 proceduresfor the modification instead of Class 2. In such cases, the Director needsthe ability to inform the permittee, by day 60, that construction shouldbe delayed. The proposed preconstruction provision was intended to allow expeditedimplementation of Class 2 modifications. Today's rule still meets thatobjective. Permittees can perform many activities prior to the constructiondate, including: Preparation of detailed design drawings, arranging forequipment delivery, making contractual arrangements for construction, etc.Additionally, if construction begins soon after the 60th day, in most casesthe permittee should be ready to operate the modified portion at the facilityby the time the Class 2 request is approved. Finally, in any case whereconstruction occurs prior to final Agency action, the permittee assumesthe risk that the request will be denied or changed. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Class 3 Modifications </ITAG>Class 3 modifications cover changes that substantially alter the facilityor its operations. Generally, they include increases in the facility'sland-based treatment, storage, or disposal capacity; increases of morethan 25 percent in the facility's non-land-based treatment or storage capacity;authorization to treat, store, or dispose of wastes not listed in the permitthat require changes in unit design or management practices; substantialchanges to landfill, surface impoundment, and waste pile liner and leachatecollection/detection systems; and substantial changes to the ground-watermonitoring systems or incinerator operating conditions. The specific modificationsthat fall into Class 3 are identified in Appendix I to 40 CFR Part 270and discussed more fully in Section IV.C of this preamble.Since Class 3 modifications involve substantial changes to facility operatingconditions or waste management practices, they should be subject to thesame review and public participation procedures as permit applications.The specific procedures for Class 3 modifications are at 40 CFR 270.42(c).The first steps in the application procedures for Class 3 modificationsare similar to the procedures for Class 2. Under andSection; 270.42(c)(1),the permittee must submit a modification request to the Agency indicatingthe change to be made to the permit; identifying the change as a Class3 modification; explaining why the modification is needed; and providingapplicable information required by 40 CFR 270.13 through 270.21, 270.62,and 270.63. As with Class 2 modifications, the permittee is encouragedto consult with the Agency before submitting the modification request.Section 270.42(c)(2) requires the permittee to notify persons on the facilitymailing list and local and State agencies about the modification request.This notice must occur not more than 7 days before the date of submissionnor more than 7 days after the date of submission. The notice must containthe same information as the Class 2 notification, including an announcementof a public informational meeting. The meeting would be held no fewer than15 days after the notice and no fewer than 15 days before the end of thecomment period. Finally, after the conclusion of the 60-day comment period, the permittingAgency then initiates the permit issuance procedures of 40 CFR Part 124for the Class 3 modification. Thus, the Agency will prepare a draft permitmodification, publish a notice allow a 45-day public comment period onthe draft permit modification, hold a public hearing on the modificationif requested, and issue or deny the permit modification. In addition, theAgency will consider and respond to all written comments received by theAgency during the 60-day public comment period as it conducts the activitiesrequired by Part 124. In the September 23 notice, EPA proposed procedures for a second publicmeeting, which would be held at the owner or operator's discretion. EPAreceived several comments objecting to the requirements prescribing howthe second meeting would be conducted (e.g., use of a neutral facilitator),particularly since the meeting was voluntary (i.e., the permittee coulddecide not to hold the meeting at all). In consideration of these comments,the Agency has dropped the reference to a second meeting in the Class 3process. The purpose of today's rule is to specify the minimum requirementsthat must be followed for a Class 3 modification. Additional activitiesbeyond those contained in today's rule (e.g., additional public meetings)may take place. In fact, EPA encourages frequent and early communicationsbetween the permittee and interested local citizens to informally addressand resolve issues these parties may have. However, it is inappropriateto prescribe how such voluntary activities must be conducted. EPA received very few additional comments on the proposed Class 3 procedures.One commenter wanted a provision for automatic authorization in the absenceof Agency decisions on Class 3 modifications. EPA declines to do this becauseClass 3 modifications may have a significant effect on human health andthe environment if the appropriate permit conditions based on Part 264standards are not developed prior to actual implementation. This situationis unlike that for Class 2 modifications, which are more limited in theirpotential to adversely impact human health and the environment. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Other Permit Modifications </ITAG>Although EPA has sought to provide a complete list of possible permit modificationsand their classifications in Appendix I, there will undoubtedly be permitmodification requests that are not included in Appendix I. Therefore, EPAtoday is establishing procedures that permittees can use under andSection;270.42(d) where a permittee wishing to make a permit modification not includedin Appendix I can submit a Class 3 modification request, or alternativelyask the Agency for a determination that Class 1 or 2 modification proceduresshould apply. In making this determination, the Agency will consider thesimilarity of the requested modification to modifications listed in AppendixI, and will also apply the general definitions of Class 1, 2, and 3 modifications.It should be noted that EPA intends to monitor decisions by permittingauthorities (both EPA Regional offices and authorized States) on modificationrequest classifications and will periodically amend Appendix I of thisregulation to include new classifications. Several commenters supported this proposed approach. Others stated thatthere should be a specified time limit on the Agency's classification determination.EPA disagrees because the determinations may be varied in nature and complexity.Also, since the decisions may sometimes be precedential, consultationsamong authorized States, EPA Regional offices, or EPA headquarters maybe necessary. The Agency is committed to making a speedy decision for theseclassifications, but believes that a deadline will not be beneficial inthese circumstances. Therefore, EPA has decided not to set a time limitfor decisions of modifications classifications. When the permittee chooses to request a classification determination insteadof following the Class 3 process, then he or she should not initiate theformal modification review procedures until the Agency has decided on theappropriate classification. Otherwise, there may be confusion among thepublic concerning which process is being followed. Furthermore, the deadlinesfor Agency decisions in the Class 2 process will not begin until afterthe Agency has decided that the Class 2 procedures are appropriate forthe modification and the permittee then proceeds in accordance with andSection;270.42(b). In any case, it should not take long for the permitting Agencyto assign a classification to the modification request. The proposal provided that the Agency would notify persons on the facilitymailing list after making a determination on an unclassified change, andthat the public and the permittee would have the right to appeal the decision.EPA is not adopting these provisions in today's rule, as discussed in sectionIV.B.6 of the preamble.<ITAG tagnum="81">5. Temporary Authorizations </ITAG>Today's rule provides the Agency with the authority to grant a permitteetemporary authorization, without prior public notice and comment, to conductactivities necessary to respond promptly to changing conditions. (<T3>See </T3>andSection; 270.42(e).) It is expected that temporary authorizationswill be useful in the following two situations: (1) To address a one-timeor short-term activity at a facility for which the full permit modificationprocess is inappropriate; or (2) to allow a facility to initiate a necessaryactivity while its permit modification request is undergoing the Class2 or 3 review process. An Agency-issued temporary authorization may be obtained for activitiesthat are necessary to: (i) Facilitate timely implementation of closureor corrective action activities; (ii) allow treatment or storage in tanksor containers of restricted wastes in accordance with Part 268; (iii) avoiddisrupting ongoing waste management activities at the permittee's facility;(iv) enable the permittee to respond to changes in the types or quantitiesof wastes being managed under the facility permit; or (v) carry out otherchanges to protect human health and the environment. Temporary authorizationscan be granted for any Class 2 modification that meets these criteria,or for a Class 3 modification that is necessary to: (i) Implement correctiveaction or closure activities; (ii) allow treatment or storage in tanksor containers of restricted waste; or (iii) provide improved managementor treatment of a waste already listed in the permit, where necessary toavoid disruption of ongoing waste management, allow the permittee to respondto changes in waste quantities, or carry out other changes to protect humanhealth and the environment. A temporary authorization will be valid fora period of up to 180 days. The term of the temporary authorization willbegin at the time of its approval by the Agency, or at some specified effectivedate shortly after the time of approval. The authorized activities mustbe completed at the end of the authorization. Several commenters responded on the subject of temporary authorizations.Several supported the approach contained in the proposal, citing the beneficialflexibility to change certain facility operations with no adverse effectto human health or the environment. Two other commenters supported the use of temporary authorizations, butfor more restricted uses (e.g., for on-site wastes only or for unexpectedsituations only). One commenter was generally opposed because of a lackof public comment and hearings. EPA disagrees because the use of temporaryauthorizations is allowed only for specified purposes, which are intendedto improve the management of hazardous wastes or respond to a criticalsituation. The Agency will have the authority to deny any requests whichare not protective of human health and the environment or do not meet thecriteria for a temporary authorization. Also, as discussed below, the permitteemust notify persons on the facility mailing list about the temporary authorizationand must comply with Part 264 standards for its duration. The proposal would not have allowed temporary authorizations for periodsof less than 90 days. In today's final rule, however, EPA has eliminatedthis minimum length to provide that the term of a temporary authorizationmay be for any period up to 180 days. Although two commenters supportedthe proposed minimum length, EPA is making today's change for two reasons.First, the minimum specified period of 90 days seemed arbitrary and wouldlikely result in restricting the Agency's flexibility to allow facilitiesto respond to temporary situations. For example, if the Agency believedthat there was good cause to authorize a facility to conduct a particularactivity without a permit modification but that the task should be completedwithin 30 days under the proposal, the Agency would be limited to approvingthe activity for 90 days or denying the request. Given that temporary authorizationswere developed to allow a rapid response without the limitations of a formalpermit modification, to set an arbitrary minimum duration would be needlesslyrestrictive and likely counterproductive. Second, the duration of a temporary authorization under proposed andSection;270.42(e) (i.e., 90 to 180 days) was inconsistent with the temporary authorizationwhich may be granted by the Agency at day 90 or 120 in the Class 2 processwhich can be granted for 1 to 180 days (see andSection; 270.42(b)(6)(i)(D)).The different treatment of these temporary authorizations could lead toconfusion. The criteria in the final rule for approval of temporary authorizationsunder andSection; 270.42(e)(3) are the same as proposed on September 23,1987 except for two changes. First, in response to several requests bycommenters, EPA is adding a specific provision for the storage and treatmentof wastes subject to the land disposal restrictions of Part 268. This willgive the regulated industry the flexibility to treat and store restrictedwastes in tanks and containers, while the permit modification process isconducted. The Agency believes that there was sufficient flexibility toapprove these changes as a temporary authorization under the proposed criteria;however, commenters wanted an assurance that the activities allowed underthe recently promulgated minor modification provision in andSection; 270.42(p)_whichwill be eliminated with today's new modification process_will be eligiblefor a temporary authorization under the new system. Therefore, these activitiesinvolving restricted wastes are specifically endorsed for temporary authorizationsin new andSection; 270.42(e)(3)(ii)(B). In a second change, EPA decided not to retain the proposed temporary authorizationprovision for management of newly regulated waste. Instead, managementof such waste is addressed solely under andSection; 270.42(g). Although somecommenters suggested keeping both alternatives, other commenters believedthat the special procedure for new wastes in andSection; 270.42(g) is generallymore appropriate. EPA believes that it is preferable to have a single procedurefor addressing newly regulated wastes, and agrees that andSection; 270.42(g)is more appropriate since it is designed specifically for that situation.(See preamble discussion in Section IV.B.7.) Section 270.42(e) (2) through (4) details the procedures for granting temporaryauthorizations. Under these procedures, the permittee must submit to theAgency a request for a temporary authorization describing the activitiesto be conducted; explain why the temporary authorization was necessary;and provide sufficient information to ensure compliance with Part 264 standards.In addition, the permittee would be required to notify all persons on thefacility mailing list and local and State agencies about the temporaryauthorization request within seven days of the request. Section 270.42(e)(3) requires the Agency to approve or deny the temporaryauthorization as quickly as practical. To approve the authorization, theAgency must find that the request meets the criteria for a temporary authorization.It should be noted that today's rule, like the proposal, requires compliancewith Part 264 for Agency-initiated temporary authorizations. This is becausethe procedures for obtaining such an authorization provides for Agencyreview of the permittee's request and an affirmative Agency action to approvethe conditions of the authorization. Therefore, an Agency permit writerwill be involved in establishing the appropriate operating conditions basedon the Part 264 standards. This is in contrast to the automatic temporaryauthorizations (discussed in Section IV.B.2.ii above) where Part 265 standardsare more appropriate since there are no Agency-prescribed site specificconditions developed. A denial of a temporary authorization request would not prejudice actionon any concurrent modification request. The denial only means that theactivities contemplated by the permittee were not eligible for a temporaryauthorization. The request could still be acceptable as a permit modification.In today's final rule, EPA has modified the language in andSection; 270.42(e)(4)from the proposal. As proposed, andSection; 270.42(e)(4)(i) required theowner or operator to submit a ``complete modification request'' within60 days of obtaining a temporary authorization. This provision assumedthere would be circumstances where the permittee might not have time toprovide all the material required under Part 270 (e.g., changes to closureplans or training plans) prior to issuance of the temporary authorization.Several commenters disagreed with this proposal, pointing out that in manycases a temporary authorization could address a short-term or one-timesituation, and would not require a permanent modification to the permitand submission of all the Part 270 information. EPA agrees with these commenters,and finds the 60-day deadline unnecessary, particularly since andSection;270.42(e)(3)(i) requires the permittee to demonstrate in his or her requestthat the Part 264 standards will be achieved. Thus, the Director shouldhave all information necessary prior to a temporary authorization decision.In cases where some additional minor information is needed, the Directorcould make the authorization conditional on the submission of this informationon an appropriate schedule.The proposal allowed the renewal of a temporary authorization (andSection;270.42 (e)(1) and (e)(4)(iii)), if the permittee initiated the Class 2or 3 process for a permit modification. Today's rule modifies and clarifiesthese provisions. As required in andSection; 270.42(e)(4) today, a temporaryauthorization cannot be reissued except through the following procedures.First, the permittee must initiate the appropriate Class 2 or 3 modificationprocess for the activity covered in the temporary authorization. In addition,for a Class 2 modification, any extension of the activity approved in thetemporary authorization must take place under Class 2 procedures. Finally,for a Class 3 modification, the Director may extend the temporary authorizationif warranted to allow the authorized activity to continue while Class 3procedures are completed. The result of today's change for a temporary authorization that is concurrentlyundergoing the Class 2 review is to set a limit, generally, of 300 daysfor operation under the temporary authorization. The proposal would haveallowed, in extreme cases, up to 540 days of temporary authorization beforea final Agency decision was required. (For example, a 280-day authorization,reissued for a second 180-day period, and then the Director's decisionper andSection; 270.42(e)(4)(ii) to issue an additional authorization of180 days.) These changes were made in response to commenters, who requesteda shorter and clearer schedule for Agency decisions on Class 2 changessubject to temporary authorizations. EPA agrees with these comments, andmaintains that Class 2 changes should be reviewed rapidly and incorporatedinto the permit as a modification. It is not appropriate for these decisionsto be postponed for up to a year and a half. For these reasons, today'srule does not allow extension of a temporary authorization for a Class2 activity, except through the Class 2 procedures that are leading to anAgency decision on the modification request. For Class 3 modifications, the renewal of the temporary authorization isat the discretion of the Director if he or she believes that it is appropriatefor the activities to continue while the Class 3 modification process iscompleted. In most cases it will be difficult to complete the Class 3 processin the 180 days allowed for the temporary authorization, since there willbe at least 105 days of public comment (60 days for comment on the applicant'smodification request and 45 days for comment on the draft permit modificationprepared by the Agency), as well as one or more public meetings and a publichearing, if requested. Therefore, today's rule allows the extension ofa Class 3 temporary authorization for an additional 180 days, for a maximumof 360 days. However, this would be allowed only if the facility is proceedingtoward a Class 3 modification. In summary, the Agency-issued temporary authorization mechanism providesa reasonable balance between the public's right to be informed of and commenton activities at permitted hazardous waste facilities and the facilityowner/operator's need to implement certain changes rapidly. More generally,the temporary authorization procedure will provide important flexibilityto permitted hazardous waste facilities without sacrifice to public healthor the environment. Because temporary authorizations are designed specificallyfor activities necessary to improve management of hazardous waste or toconduct timely closures and corrective actions, this authority should actuallyreduce risk and promote safe handling of wastes. For this reason, EPA believesthat the temporary authorization procedure will be of benefit to the regulatedindustry, regulating agencies, and the public. <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Notification Requirements and Permit Modification Appeals </ITAG>Under today's rule, the Director will notify persons on the facility mailinglist and appropriate state and local government agencies within 10 daysof any decision to grant or deny a permit modification request (exceptfor Class 1 modifications and temporary authorizations). (<T3>See </T3>andSection; 270.42(f).) Such notification will also be givenwithin l0 days after a Class 2 automatic authorization takes effect. Thepermit appeal procedures of 40 CFR 124.19 apply to the Director's decisionto grant or deny a Class 2 or 3 permit modification request and to Class2 automatic authorizations. For Class 1 modifications, temporary authorizations,and classification determinations, the appeal procedures of Part 124 donot apply, although in many cases there are opportunities to seek a changein the modification or authorization, as discussed in more detail below.The proposal provided that the Agency would notify persons on the facilitymailing list after making a determination on an unclassified change, afterapproving a Class 1 modification (when prior approval is needed), and aftergranting a temporary authorization. However, EPA received a number of commentsfrom state agencies and industry arguing that there are too many requirednotices in the proposal, and that numerous notifications add complexityto the process and divert Agency resources to administrative tasks insteadof to protection of the environment. EPA agrees with this comment for notificationsof temporary authorizations, classification determinations, and Class 1approvals. In the case of Agency classification determinations, there will be subsequentpublic notification of the proposed changes as the facility proceeds withits modification request. The public will be able to raise concerns atthat time if they believe that the modification request has been incorrectlyclassified. For these reasons, EPA believes that the notice regarding aclassification determination would be redundant, and therefore is not adoptingit in today's rule. For Class 1 modifications, the permittee is required to provide noticeof the change to persons on the facility mailing list within 90 days, includingthose cases where prior Director approval is required. (See andSection; 270.42(a)(1)(ii).)The proposal would have also required that the Agency send a notice ofits decision to the facility mailing list for a Class 1 modification thatrequired prior Agency approval. EPA believes that there is no need forthe Agency to mail such a notice since the permittee will be sending asimilar notice. Two notifications regarding a single Class 1 modificationwould be a duplication of effort and could also be confusing to peopleon the mailing list. For these reasons, EPA has eliminated the redundantAgency notice for Class 1 modification determinations in the final rule.For Agency-issued temporary authorizations, a notice is sent to personson the facility mailing list and to appropriate government agencies within7 days of the facility's request. Thus, there is opportunity for the publicto express its concerns to the permitting agency regarding the facility'sapplication. Since many temporary authorizations will be of short duration(a few weeks to six months), a single notice of the activity should besufficient. If the activity will continue beyond 180 days, the facilityis obligated to follow the Class 2 or 3 process, which will provide fora second notification and opportunity to comment. For these reasons, EPAbelieves that the notification mailing regarding the Agency's decisionto grant a temporary authorization would be repetitive and unnecessary.In the proposal, andSection; 270.42(f)(2) provided for the appeal of theDirector's decision to classify a permit modification request, under theprocedures of Part 124. One commenter objected to the public being ableto provide input and delay progress on the processing of an unclassifiedfacility change. While EPA maintains that public involvement in these decisionsis useful and important, it also believes that once a determination hasbeen made as to the appropriate modification procedures for a particularfacility change, the permittee's application should be processed accordingly.As discussed earlier, the modification review process will provide an opportunityfor indicating concerns regarding the Agency's classification decision.However, if a formal appeal were allowed for the classification decision,then a single appeal request could effectively require any modificationto follow the Class 3 process_or else delay the modification process formonths while awaiting the Administrator's decision on the appeal_regardlessof the merits of the appeal. Therefore, today's rule does not provide forappeals of andSection; 270.42(d) classification decisions. As discussed above, during the modification approval process the commenterswill be able to indicate any concerns with the classification assignedby the Agency. If the Agency agrees with the comments, then it could reclassifythe permittee's request and initiate the appropriate modification procedures.For example, if in the course of a Class 2 modification process the Agencyis convinced by commenters to follow the Class 3 procedures instead, thenthe Agency would prepare the appropriate notification and draft permitas required by Part 124 after the Class 2 comment period is concluded.However, if the Agency disagrees with the request to reclassify the modification,then it must provide its response in the administrative record; such decisionconstitutes a final Agency determination and is not subject to appeal underPart 124 procedures. Although the proposal would have applied the Part 124 appeals proceduresto Class 1 modifications and temporary authorizations, today's final ruledoes not contain such appeal procedures. For Class 1 changes, any personcan request the Director to review the modification, and the Director may,for cause, reject the modification. This mechanism provides recourse forpersons concerned about such a modification. Due to the very limited natureof Class 1 changes, however, the Agency does not expect these activitiesto be called into question. Agency-issued temporary authorizations are intended to allow facilitiesto respond rapidly to changing conditions and to enhance the environmentalprotection at the site. Because swift action is essential for these authorizations,and since they will only allow operation for a maximum of 180 days (unlessa permanent permit modification has also been requested), EPA believesthat the Part 124 appeals procedures cannot be integrated into the temporaryauthorization process without undermining the fundamental purpose of suchauthorizations. One commenter suggested that if a subsequent denial of already implementedmodified operations conducted under a Class 1 modification, a Class 2 automaticauthorization, or a temporary authorization is appealed, those operationsshould be allowed to continue until the appeal is resolved. As discussedabove, today's final rule does not provide for appeals for Class 1 andtemporary authorization decisions. If the Agency denies one of these activitiesafter the facility has already implemented it pursuant to today's rule,then the Agency may provide for a reasonable period of time for the facilityto cease operation, if appropriate. In the case of automatic authorizations,EPA agrees with this commenter. If a permittee has followed the establishedClass 2 procedures and an automatic authorization has occurred, then heshould be entitled to operate pursuant to such authorization until theAgency has made a final determination or until an appeal opposing the automaticauthorization has been granted. Otherwise, a single appeal could negateany automatic authorization before the Agency has been able to review themerits of the appeal. Therefore, today's rule provides that in the caseof an appeal of an automatic authorization, the authorization remains ineffect until such appeal is granted. <ITAG tagnum="81">7. Newly Listed or Identified Wastes </ITAG>``Today EPA is promulgating a new provision in andSection; 270.42(g) thatprovides permittees with a special procedure for modifying permits whenwastes they are already managing are newly listed or identified by EPAas hazardous. Under this provision, the permittee must submit a Class 1modification request at the time the waste becomes subject to the new listingor identification_that is, on or before the effective date of the rulelisting or identifying the waste. If the changes at the facility constitutea Class 2 or 3 modification, the permittee must submit, in addition tothe above Class 1 request, a complete permit modification request within180 days of the effective date. Until a final decision is made on the modificationrequest, the permittee must comply with Part 265 standards. In addition,where new wastes or units are added to a facility's permit under this approach,they would not count against the 25 percent expansion limit for Class 2modifications. Finally, for land disposal units, the owner or operatoris required to certify compliance with all applicable groundwater monitoringand financial responsibility requirements within one year of the effectivedate. If the owner or operator fails to make this certification, he orshe will lose authorization to operate the unit.EPA is taking this action for several reasons. First, the Agency believesthat several rules expected in the next few years, such as the OrganicToxicity Characteristic, will classify additional wastes as hazardous.A potential for disruption in the handling of these newly identified wastesexists because of the time involved in the permit modification processfor permitted facilities, particularly when Class 3 modifications are needed.If the permittee has not obtained a permit modification when a listingor identification becomes effective, the facility could not handle thewaste until the permit is revised as needed. There may be a severe shortagein waste management capacity if a significant number of facilities whichhave previously handled the newly identified wastes are barred from doingso because they have not been able to obtain permit modifications. In addition,the on-going operations of many facilities will be severely disrupted.This scenario will become more likely as more facilities obtain RCRA permits.A second reason for this procedure is that, without it, permit writersmay be forced to give these modifications a very high priority, regardlessof the effect on the environment, because of the potential impact on capacityand the disruption of facilities. Since permitting resources are limited,other permitting activities with greater environmental consequences maybe delayed. Last, there would be an inequity between permitted facilities, and interimstatus or unpermitted facilities. Under RCRA, previously unregulated facilitiescan gain interim status after a waste is newly listed or identified ashazardous, allowing them to continue to handle the waste, simply by submittinga Part A application and, if required, by complying with section 3010 notificationrequirements. Interim status facilities would be able to continue to handlenewly listed or identified wastes through a change in interim status withouta detailed permitting review by the Agency. Permitted facilities however,would require a Class 2 or 3 permit modification in most cases. As a result,permitted facilities would be treated unequally when wastes are newly listedor identified. The procedures adopted today rectify the potential disequilibriumbetween permitted and interim status facilities. Today's rulemaking is also consistent with the August 14, 1987 proposedrule for Changes to Interim Status and Permitted Facilities for HazardousWaste Management (see 52 FR 30570). The August 14 proposal is procedurallyvery similar to today's rule. The one difference is that the August 14proposal would have required facilities to initially obtain prior Agencyapproval through the minor modification process before handling newly regulatedwastes. Today's rule, on the other hand, uses the Class 1 procedure, whichdoes not require prior EPA approval. The permittee simply has to notifythe Agency and the public under the Class 1 procedures to put into effecta modification involving a newly listed or regulated waste. The August14 proposal did not contemplate an approach like the one in today's rulesince the August 14 proposal was based on the framework of the currentminor modification regulations, which do not provide for permit modificationswithout prior Agency approval. EPA has decided not to adopt the procedure for newly regulated waste suggestedin the August 14 proposal, since that proposal was intended as only aninterim mechanism until this permit modification rule became final. Wenote that commenters to the August 14 proposal generally supported a specialprocedure for newly listed or identified waste. However, some commentersfelt that the proposal should have gone even further in giving permitteesthe same flexibility as interim status facilities. Today's permit modificationrule provides this equal flexibility. EPA has reviewed the comments tothis portion of the August 14 proposal, and responds to them below. The Agency received many comments on this section of today's rulemaking.Two commenters stated that the date of submission for the initial Class1 request should be clarified. EPA agrees and has amended andSection; 270.42(g)(1)(ii)to require that the Class 1 request must be submitted on or before theeffective date of the rule which newly lists or identifies a waste as hazardous.This final rule will also retain the requirement that the subsequent Class2 or 3 requests must be submitted within 180 days of the effective datefor the new listing or identification. Several commenters favored thisposition. One commenter argued that a shorter period would be mcre appropriate.EPA disagrees. The 180-day time limit for submission provides a reasonablebalance between a speedy permit process that is protective of human healthand the environment, and the need to allow both the facility and the permitwriter to develop the appropriate but often complex permit conditions.As specified andSection; 270.42(g)(1)(iii), the facility must comply withthe standards of Part 265 during this period. Several commenters on the September 23, 1987, and August 14, 1987 proposalsexpressed concern about when they had to be handling the newly listed oridentified wastes to be eligible to use this procedure. Under the proposal,to be eligible, facilities would have to be handling the waste at the timeof publication of the final rule listing or identifying the waste as hazardous.Most of the commenters argued that the requirements should be consistentwith those for unpermitted facilities, which can gain interim status ifthey are ``in existence'' as hazardous waste management facilities at thetime the new listing or identification becomes effective. EPA agrees withthis comment. The Agency believes that it is inequitable in this case tohave different tests for permitted and interim status facilities, and thereforehas modified the rule accordingly. Therefore, in response to these comments, the Agency has removed the proposedrequirement that the facility must be handling the waste at the time ofpublication of the final rule for the new waste. Instead, today's rulespecifies that permitted facilities eligible for this provision must be``in existence'' as hazardous waste facilities for the waste in questionon the listing or identification's effective date. This standard is identicalto the standard for facilities qualifying for interim status when the permittingregulations were initially issued. For further information on this concept,see the preamble discussion at 45 FR 76630 (November 19, 1980). Finally, EPA has added a new requirement for land disposal units eligiblefor a permit modification under this section. Under andSection; 270.42(g)(1)(v),the owner or operator of such units must, within one year of the effectivedate of the new listing or identification, certify compliance with Part265 ground-water monitoring and financial responsibility requirements.If the owner or operator fails to do this, he or she would lose authorityto operate the unit. EPA has included this provision, which was proposedin the August 14, 1987, notice, to ensure consistency with unpermittedfacilities. Of course, if the Agency modifies the permit to incorporatePart 264 before the one year period is up, the facility does not need tosubmit a certification.<ITAG tagnum="81">8. Publication of Permit Modification List </ITAG>As required by andSection; 270.42(h), EPA (or the authorized State) willmaintain a list of approved permit modifications and publish a state-widenotice annually that the list is available for review. The public noticewill primarily serve as a reminder to the public that an updated list isavailable for review. Members of the public interested in a closer reviewcan follow the Agency's actions on a site-specific basis. This provisionis unchanged from the proposal. C. Classification of Permit Modifications Today's rule creates Appendix I to Part 270 that identifies what typesof facility changes constitute Classes 1, 2, and 3 modifications. Thisclassification list generally follows the organization of the facilitystandards in Part 264 and is designed to be self-explanatory. Most commenters generally supported the concept of using Appendix I toclassify types of facility changes into Classes 1, 2, and 3 modifications.However, concerns over several general issues and a number of specificitems included in Appendix I of Part 270 were raised. Although most commenters supported the classification of facility changesinto Classes 1, 2, and 3 modifications, several questioned the practicalityof increasing the number of classes of modifications from the two-tieredsystem (i.e., major and minor modifications). These commenters felt thatwith three categories of modifications the process will be more complicatedand may increase the number of misunderstandings between the regulatedcommunity and EPA or authorized States which could lead to numerous appeals.Two commenters expressed a preference for expanding the current list ofminor modifications instead of reclassification. EPA believes, as did thePermit Modification Negotiating Committee, that three classes are necessaryto provide EPA and authorized States the flexibility to appropriately addressvarious types of permit modifications. The current system provides onlytwo procedures for modifying a permit_the minor modification procedureprovides for no public notification or comment, while the major modificationprocedure requires all the formal proceedings of permit issuance. In contrast,the three classifications will provide EPA and authorized States the appropriatemechanisms for processing a wide spectrum of permit changes in a timelymanner. EPA believes that the system of three classifications and the associatedprocedures will provide the necessary flexibility while ensuring early,appropriate public participation. The specificity of Appendix I caused several commenters to be concernedthat permit modifications would be required under the proposed rule forminor changes to a facility that would not currently require modification.EPA clarifies that permit modifications are applicable only when changesmade to a facility affect a condition specified in the permit. Thus, forexample, if a particular item of equipment, including the manufacturer'sname and the model number, is specified in a permit, replacing that itemwith an identical item (same manufacturer and model number) would not affectthat permit condition and would not require a modification. Similarly,if the equipment is described generally, then changing that equipment alsowould not require a permit modification as long as the new equipment metthe same definition and specifications. Normal routine maintenance wouldnot usually require a permit modification unless the activity directlyaffects a condition specified in the permit. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Change of Facility Owner or Operator </ITAG>The current regulations governing change in ownership or operational controlare addressed in andSection; 270.40 (Transfer of permits), andSection; 270.41(b)(2)(Causes for modification or revocation and reissuance of permits), andandSection; 270.42(d) (Minor modifications of permits). These regulationsallow the Agency to make a minor modification to a permit to reflect achange in ownership or operational control, provided the new owner or operatorsubmits a revised permit application within 90 days prior to the scheduledchange and demonstrates compliance with 40 CFR Part 264 Subpart H (FinancialRequirements) within six months of the scheduled change. During the transferof the permit, the previous owner or operator must comply with the requirementsof Subpart H until the new owner or operator has demonstrated to the Directorthat he or she is complying with the requirements of that subpart. When considering how to incorporate changes in ownership or operationalcontrol into the new modification approach, the Negotiating Committee couldnot agree on the most appropriate classification. Therefore, EPA publisheda second permit modification <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice on November 28, 1987 (52 FR 44153) thatproposed essentially to retain the current standards for changes in ownershipor operational control by classifying such modifications as Class 1 withprior Agency approval. This classification retained the existing levelof Agency oversight, but provided the additional public participation opportunitiescontained in the Class 1 procedure. EPA received several comments that supported the proposal, and is todayincorporating this approach into the final rule. EPA decided, however,that this provision should be set forth in the andSection; 270.40 regulationinstead of in the Appendix, as proposed, due to the prescriptive conditionsassociated with this type of modification. Therefore, in today's rule,the existing language in andSection; 270.40 is designated as andSection; 270.40(a),and a new paragraph (b) is added to address changes in ownership or operationalcontrol. In Appendix I, new Item A(7) identifies changes in ownership oroperational control as a Class 1 modification with prior Agency approval,but refers to andSection; 270.40(b) for the substantive requirements. Two commenters objected to the requirement for submission of a revisedpermit application at least 90 days before the scheduled change. They wantedto be able to make such business transactions in a shorter period of timeby not having to wait for Agency approval. Another commenter thought thatthis modification should be a Class 1 change with prior Agency approvalonly for the financial responsibility requirements in Subpart H. Two othercommenters suggested that the Class 2 process for changes in ownershipor operational control would be more appropriate. As stated in the November18 notice, EPA recently completed a rulemaking on these issues regardingchanges in owner and operator (May 2, 1986, 51 FR 16422), and is thereforereluctant to overturn these requirements based on the few comments receivedon the subject in this rulemaking.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. General Permit Provisions </ITAG>The items identified under ``General Permit Provisions'' in Appendix Iare primarily derived from conditions applicable to all permits as specifiedin andSection;andSection; 270.30-270.33. Other general changes included inthis section are administrative in nature, or recur throughout the Part264 regulations but would be more simply addressed in one place (e.g.,frequency of reporting). The first two items in Appendix I specify that administrative and informationalchanges or correction of typographical errors in the permit are Class 1modifications. Comment was requested on whether correction of ``minor factualerrors'' should be added as a Class 1 change and on how this should bedefined. One commenter supported the addition of this item, but did notsuggest a definition. EPA decided not to add this item to Appendix I sinceit believes that many of these changes will be covered under other itemsin the Appendix (e.g., training plans, contingency plans), or, if not,the permittee may request a determination by the Director that the modificationbe treated as a Class 1 or 2 under andSection; 270.42(d). Under Item A(3), permittees are able to make routine equipment replacementsthat are necessary for the continued operation of the facility. Equipmentthat frequently needs replacement includes pumps, pipes, valves, incineratorfire-brick, and instrument readout devices. In most cases, such replacementswould not require a permit modification since the permit would acknowledgethem as ongoing maintenance activities. However, some permit conditionsmay inadvertently create restrictions by incorporating portions of thePart B permit application by reference. For example, if a permit incorporatesa design drawing by reference which specifies a particular piece of equipment_includingthe manufacturer's name and the model number of the item_then to replacethe item with anything other than the original model might require a permitmodification. Such an item may not be available at a later date when itneeds replacement, or the permittee may prefer to replace it with an improvedversion. EPA does not believe that anyone (the permittee, the public, or the government)benefits from subjecting such routine maintenance functions to the permitmodification process. It is preferable that permits contain sufficientflexibility to allow these kinds of equipment replacements outside of thepermit modification process. Therefore, if it is necessary to include designdrawings in permits, the permit condition should also allow minor deviationsfrom the design without a permit modification (although the Director maywant to have the permittee send the revised design to the Agency to maintaina current file on the facility). In spite of the preferred method of drafting permit conditions, there aremany existing RCRA permits that contain very detailed information regardingfacility equipment and provide little or no leeway for deviation. Therefore,Item A(3) in the Appendix provides that equipment replacement or upgradingwith functionally equivalent components is a Class 1 change. This willallow the facility to change ancillary equipment without prior approvalif the original equipment is no longer made or to take advantage of betterdesigned products, so long as the new equipment is functionally equivalentto the equipment it replaces. (The definition of ``functionally equivalent''is discussed later in the preamble.) Item A(4) addresses changes in frequency of monitoring, reporting, andmaintenance activities. One commenter requested that ``sampling'' be addedto Item A(4), stating that it logically belonged with monitoring, reporting,and maintenance activities. EPA believes that sampling is included in theterm monitoring (as in ground-water or unsaturated zone monitoring). However,to clarify this, ``sampling'' has been added to these items. Item (A)(5) allows changes in interim compliance dates in schedules ofcompliance as a Class 1 modification with prior Director approval. However,where such changes would likely delay the final date of compliance, itwould instead proceed as a Class 3 change. Several commenters argued that many modifications should be classifiedas Class 1 whenever an improvement is being made to equipment, hazardouswaste management units, or facility management standards. EPA disagreeswith this suggestion since such a provision would be much too broad forthe Class 1 category, and could lead to major changes at a facility thatwould be more appropriate as Class 2 or 3 modifications. Furthermore, ifa permittee wishes to make such improvements expeditiously, he or she couldseek a temporary authorization. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. General Facility Standards </ITAG>The ``General Facility Standards'' portion of Appendix I encompasses changesthat affect the general standards and requirements that apply to all hazardouswaste facilities (Subparts B through E of Part 264). These changes primarilyinvolve the various plans that must be maintained by the facility (e.g.,contingency plan, training plan) and are self-explanatory.EPA has made one addition to this section to clarify a point that was notclear in the proposal. In many cases, specific changes at a facility willnecessitate changes in general facility standards and plans. For example,the introduction of a new waste at a unit might necessitate a change inthe contingency plan, or the addition of a new unit might require a changein the facility's closure or security plan. In such cases, the changesin the plan would be reviewed and approved under the same procedures asare required for the introduction of the new waste or the new unit. Thus,if a facility brought a tank treatment unit on-site for 90 days under Class1 procedures, review of any necessary changes in the facility's contingencyplan or waste analysis plan would take place under Class 1 procedures aswell. This point is clarified in a note added to Section B of AppendixI. It should be noted that the permit changes that may be reviewed in thisfashion are limited to the items specifically identified in Section B ofthe appendix; i.e., general facility standards and plans. Therefore, ifthe addition of a new waste involved a new tank unit with different managementpractices than those authorized by the permit (<T3>see </T3>Item G(5)(b)), then the Class 3 procedures apply. Several commenters had suggestions on specific items in Section (B). Onecommenter suggested that only significant changes in the procedures formaintaining the operating record should require a permit modification (seeItem B(3)). The commenter was concerned that changes in a computer programthat is used in conjunction with the operating record could require a modification.It is not EPA's intent to require modifications for such recordkeepingmethods. It is unlikely that actual procedures for maintaining the operatingrecord (other than the location of the record) will be specified in permits;therefore there is already significant flexibility in the method of maintainingthe record, as long as the requirements of andSection; 264.73 are met. However,EPA emphasizes that in cases where procedures for maintaining the operatingrecord are specified in the permit, a Class 1 permit modification willbe required for a change that affects the permit condition. In a related matter, several commenters were concerned that modificationslisted in Appendix I (e.g., B(4) changes in frequency or content of inspectionschedules) would require a facility to go through a Class 2 permit modificationto carry out more frequent or more extensive activities than required inthe permit. Again, EPA would like to clarify that as long as a specificpermit condition is not affected by a change, a modification is not required.Thus, as long as the frequency and content of inspections specified inthe permit are fulfilled, additional inspections would not require a modification.Several commenters argued that items classified as Class 2 under SectionB(6), Contingency Plan, should be reclassified as Class 1. EPA disagreesand points out that these items, (changes in emergency procedures and removalof equipment from emergency equipment list) may lead to a significant decreasein the level of protection for human health and the environment. Thus,a Class 2 modification is appropriate to allow public comment on each proposedchange. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Ground-Water Protection </ITAG>Subpart F of Part 264 specifies the RCRA system for protecting ground-water.Permitted facilities subject to ground-water monitoring requirements havevery detailed permit conditions regarding the hazardous constituents tobe monitored; concentration limits of hazardous constituents that triggersubsequent actions; and the number, location, depth, and design specificationsof monitoring wells. In the proposal, EPA suggested 11 items for inclusion in Appendix I todescribe anticipated changes in permitted ground-water protection programs.EPA reevaluated the proposed classifications, and found that several ofthe items were redundant and that a few others could be clarified. In addition,commenters suggested several improvements that could be made. For thesereasons, the ground-water items in Section C of the Appendix have beenrestructured (as discussed below) to define these modifications more precisely.EPA believes that Class 2 is an appropriate category for many ground-watermonitoring changes, because the modification requests must indicate compliancewith Part 264 requirements and because_once ground-water monitoring systemshave been established and approved as part of the original permit_changesin the systems will generally be minor and technical. In fact, EPA believesthat most changes will be made to improve permitted systems because ofnew information, improved technology, or other considerations. Therefore,public health and the environment will be best served by an expedited approvalprocedure for these kinds of changes. The first item in the appendix addresses changes to wells (C(1)). Thisclassification is unchanged from the proposal except that well replacementsthat result in a change to location, design, or depth of the well_whichwas a separate item in the proposal_is now merged into Item C(1)(A) whichdescribes all changes that affect number, location, depth, or design ofwells. Such changes are Class 2. Item C(1)(b) identifies certain well replacementsthat are Class 1 changes, namely the replacement of a damaged or inoperablewell that does not involve a change in its location, design, or depth.Several commenters argued that changes in sampling or analysis proceduresor changes in statistical procedures should be reclassified as Class 1with prior Director approval since they are technical in nature and generallyof limited interest to the public. EPA agrees with these comments and haschanged them in today's final rule to be Class 1 modifications with priorapproval. (See Items C (2) and (3).) The Agency should be able to respondpromptly to such facility requests, particularly where they will lead tomore representative or improved sampling, analysis, or evaluation techniques.Furthermore, since these changes are easily reversible, any subsequentconcerns raised by the public could be considered and implemented, if merited.A change in the point of compliance (C(4)) is a Class 2 change as proposed,although the language in this provision has been changed slightly to indicatethat such changes may be necessary when land-based units are added to thefacility. Changes in indicator parameters, hazardous constituents, or concentrationlimits are addressed in Item C(5). If such changes are made in the detectionmonitoring program they are Class 2, whereas a Class 3 modification isrequired where the ground-water protection standard is affected. This classificationis a result of consolidating five of the items in the proposed appendix.In the proposal, changes in hazardous constituents for which the ground-waterprotection standard applies (proposed C(1)) and changes in concentrationlimit (C(2)) were identified as Class 3 changes; in today's rule item C(5)(a)encompasses these changes. Today's Class 2 changes in C(5)(b) are derivedfrom three proposed items: Changes in established background ground-waterquality concentration levels (C(6)); changes in parameters or constituents(C(8)); and reduction in number of hazardous constituents analyzed foran assessment program based on no evidence of wastes in the unit (C(11)).Commenters supported the proposed classification of these items; however,the proposed language was redundant in some cases (e.g., proposed (C) (8)and (11)). Furthermore, EPA believed that some confusion may have resultedfrom the scattered nature of these items. Therefore, the Agency consolidatedthese actions to address them comprehensively in a single place. A new Item C(6) has been added to address changes made in the detectionmonitoring program. Although this item was not mentioned in the proposal,andSection; 264.98(j) specifically requires a permit modification when thedetection monitoring program no longer meets the requirements specifiedin the regulations. The Agency is establishing this as a Class 2 modificationin today's rule. Changes in the detection monitoring system are comparableto the kinds of changes that could occur in a compliance monitoring program,which are identified as Class 2 (as discussed below). Comments were also requested on two items added to Appendix I in the proposal:Changes to a compliance program (C(7)) and addition of or changes to acorrective action program (C(8)). (Note that these changes are typicallyimposed by the Agency and therefore would follow the modification proceduresof andSection; 270.41, unless the permittee elected to use the andSection;270.42 procedures instead.) No comments were received on changes to a complianceprogram, and it remains a Class 2 modification in today's rule. One commenterraised the point that classifying all changes to a corrective action programas Class 3 would require permittees to go through the Class 3 modificationprocedures for changes that under a detection program would be classifiedas Class 1 or 2. The commenter suggested that the general classificationof corrective action changes should not subsume specific ground-water monitoringmodifications that have been identified in the Appendix. EPA agrees withthe comment, and believes that it is equally applicable to the generalprovisions for detection monitoring (C(6)) and compliance monitoring (C(7))as well. The commenter also argued that every change in a permitted correctiveaction program should not have to undergo a Class 3 modification. EPA agreeswith this comment, and has reclassified changes in the corrective actionprogram. One commenter suggested that a thorough analysis of the appropriate classificationsfor changes to corrective action permit conditions should be made in theupcoming corrective action rule. EPA agrees and adds that it intends toaddress corrective action permit modifications in conjunction with thatrule. (Also see discussion in Section III.C.9 of the preamble.) An additional comment regarding ground-water protection suggested thatproposed Item C(1) should be amended to specify that a reduction in thenumber of hazardous constituents for which the ground-water protectionstandard applies should remain Class 3 but that an increase should be Class1. The Agency points out that the ground-water protection standard is oneof the most critical elements of a ground-water protection program. Anychange to the ground-water protection standard may substantially alterthe ground-water monitoring system and is thus appropriately classifieda Class 3 modification. (In today's rule, this change has been reclassifiedas C(5)(a).)A final commenter expressed the opinion that proposed item C(11), reductionin the number of hazardous constituents analyzed for in the assessmentprogram based on no evidence of wastes in the unit, should be a Class 1rather than a Class 2 modification. First, the Agency notes that the languageof Item C(11) should have referred to the detection or compliance monitoringprogram since there is no assessment program under the Part 264 permitstandards. Second, the classification of this item remains Class 2 in thefinal rule and has been renumbered as C(5)(b). Participants in the permittingprocess may not necessarily agree upon whether or not evidence of wastein a unit exists; thus some level of Agency and public review is appropriateto make a determination on this issue. This type of modification is notalways a trivial change, but it is a common change that may be necessaryto maintain a facility's capability to manage wastes. Thus, a Class 2 modificationis appropriate. Permittees should understand that, if a permit modification request doesnot provide documentation that the modification will fully comply withPart 264 standards and will not reduce the effectiveness of the ground-watermonitoring system, EPA or an authorized state will deny the request. (Alternatively,the Agency could extend the review period, with the approval of the permittee,to allow for appropriate improvements in the request.) Therefore, permitteesshould consult closely with the regulating agency before requesting thesemodifications, except in the most straightforward of cases. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Different Wastes in a Unit </ITAG>The use of the term ``different wastes'' in the Appendix I list refersto changes involving the introduction of hazardous wastes to units thatare not permitted to handle these wastes. In other words, the facilitymay be seeking to accept wastes that were not previously identified inthe permit, or it may already be managing the waste but would prefer toshift it to a different treatment, storage, or disposal process. Permitmodifications for ``newly regulated wastes''_those wastes that are newlylisted or identified_are treated somewhat differently, as described inSection IV.B.8 of this preamble. Permit modifications to allow different wastes at a permitted unit areclassified into two general categories. The first situation involves differentwastes that are sufficiently similar to wastes currently authorized atthe unit so that no additional or different management practice, design,or process is required. As an example, a unit may be permitted only totreat specific solvent wastes, but may be equally capable of treating othersolvent wastes that exhibit similar physical and chemical properties withinthe same management conditions of the permit. In these cases, the permitmodification will follow the Class 2 process. The second situation is where the introduction of a different waste ata unit will require different or additional management practices, design,or processes to properly manage the waste_for instance, if the waste isreactive or ignitable_and the permit conditions does not anticipate thatsuch wastes will be managed in the unit. These circumstances require aClass 3 permit modification. In the proposal the term ``new wastes in a unit'' was used instead of ``differentwastes in a unit'' in Appendix I. This led a number of commenters to confusethe Appendix I modifications, which address the management of existinghazardous wastes in different units from those prescribed by the permit,with the separate provision concerning the management of newly listed oridentified wastes. Since there are different modification procedures forthe management of newly listed or identified wastes (andSection; 270.42(g)),the distinction is critical. To clarify this issue for persons using AppendixI, in today's rule the Agency is using the term ``management of differentwastes in a unit'' to refer to changes involving the introduction of hazardouswastes to units that are not permitted to handle these wastes. Also, noteshave been added to the Appendix to reference andSection; 270.42(g) for modificationprocedures to be used for the management of newly listed or identifiedwastes. Many commenters suggested that the modifications regarding management ofdifferent wastes in each specific type of unit be reclassified or downgraded.EPA considered these comments, but has decided to retain the respectiveclassifications as proposed for the following reasons. First, when a facilityproposes to alter the way that its wastes will be treated, stored, or disposed,then the public should have an opportunity to comment on the proposal priorto a final Agency decision. The Class 2 and 3 processes provide for suchpublic input. Second, where the introduction of different wastes to a unitinvolves additional or different operating procedures or management practices,there is a greater potential for significant change to the permitted operation;therefore the Class 3 process should be followed since it was designedfor those circumstances. Finally, it should be noted that in many casesthe permittee can apply for a temporary authorization to implement thedesired change while the Class 2 or 3 procedures are carried out. Therefore,the Agency believes that the framework in today's rule is appropriate andconsistent with the definitions established for the three classes. For each type of unit in Appendix I, EPA has defined general criteria asdiscussed above to be used in determining whether permit modificationsinvolving the management of new wastes represent a Class 2 or a Class 3change. Although these criteria are general in nature, EPA believes thatthey are sufficiently specific to delineate Classes 2 and 3 modifications.<ITAG tagnum="81">6. General Approach to Defining Unit-Specific Changes </ITAG>This section of the preamble describes EPA's classification of permit modificationsinvolving the various types of hazardous waste management units at a facility.In general, EPA has addressed for each type of unit: (1) Changes to oraddition of units that affect the facility's capacity, (2) changes to unitsthat do not affect facility capacity, (3) replacement of units, (4) introductionof new wastes into a unit, and (5) changes to the waste management practicesinvolving the unit. Also, EPA has identified additional changes that areappropriate for specific units. i. <T3>Tanks and Containers. </T3>The permitting standards for containersand tanks are found in 40 CFR Part 264, Subparts I and J. Because of thesimilarities of the classifications for these units, they are discussedtogether in this preamble. Furthermore, the Agency has combined ``tankstorage'' and ``tank treatment'' into a single section. The Agency believesthat this arrangement is preferable because it eliminates possible confusioncreated by duplicative language and because the Part 264 standards do notdifferentiate between tanks used for treatment and tanks used for storage.Tank system and container changes or additions resulting in a capacityincrease of 25 percent or less qualify as Class 2 modifications as longas they do not involve other changes that require a Class 3 modification(i.e., treatment of new wastes using a different tank design or process_discussedlater in this section of the preamble). This allows modest capacity growthat a facility without the full-scale procedures for major modifications,but with an appropriate level of public notice and participation. Any changeleading to an increase of more than 25 percent requires a Class 3 modification(except for certain specific unit operations described later in this section).The 25 percent limit is based on the initial permitted capacity for tanksystems or containers. As an example, a facility that has a permit forboth tank systems and containers may bring on additional tank systems asClass 2 modifications until the cumulative increase in tank capacity equals25 percent of the tank capacity specified in the initial permit. Similarchanges may be made involving container units, based on the initial containercapacity. Once the 25 percent limit is reached, all subsequent modificationsinvolving capacity increases for the specific type of unit must followthe Class 3 process. Another example that illustrates the limited nature of this Class 2 provisionis where a facility's permit specifies extensive container storage, butthere is no provision for tank storage. In this case, the container storageoperation may be expanded through a Class 2 change (subject to the 25 percentlimit), but the addition of tanks is a Class 3 modification since therewas no permitted tank capacity. Several commenters argued that F(2), modification of a container unit withoutincreasing the capacity, should be reclassified from Class 2 to Class 1with prior Agency approval. One example is the addition of a roof to acontainer unit. EPA believes that the addition of a roof to a containerunit without alteration of the containment system is an appropriate Class1 modification and has added this to Appendix I as Item F(2)(b). Otherunspecified changes in this category, however, still fall within the definitionof Class 2 modifications: Changes to improve the design of hazardous wastemanagement units without substantially altering the conditions of the permitor reducing protection of human health or the environment. In developing the rule, EPA considered the addition of certain tanks thatperform particular treatment activities_neutralization, dewatering, phaseseparation, or component separation_that are fairly elementary physicalprocesses. These unit operations are relatively simple in design and areoften found in temporary or mobile treatment units (MTUs). EPA recognizesthe growing interest for using such MTUs since they provide industry significantflexibility in selecting among treatment technologies, in pretreating wastesbefore final treatment, and in reducing waste volume before shipping, andin conducting closure and corrective action. To address this issue, EPAproposed in Item G(1)(d) that new tanks performing these functions be allowedto operate for 90 days or less under Class 1 procedures, with prior Directorapproval. New tanks performing these functions for more than 90 days wouldbe addressed under Class 2 procedures, even if they involved a greaterthan 25 percent increase in the facility's tank capacity (e.g., if thefacility in question had limited or no tank capacity). Introduction of temporary tank treatment units might also require changesin ancillary plans, such as closure, contingency, or personnel trainingplans. In this case, these changes are considered part of the overall permitmodification required to introduce these units at the facility, and willbe approved under Class 1 procedures as well. Comment was specifically requested on the classification of the temporary(i.e., less than 90 days) addition of tanks to perform neutralization,dewatering, phase separation, or component separation (G(1)(d)). Threecommenters supported the classification of these changes as Class 1 withprior Agency approval, while none opposed it. In light of these comments,this modification has been identified as Class 1 with prior Agency approvalin the final rule. One additional commenter argued that stabilization should be added to thetreatment activities included in Items G(1) (c) and (d). EPA acknowledgesthat this suggestion would simplify and expedite pretreatment of wastesat the time of disposal or  unit closure. Further, the Agency believesthat the requirement of Director approval would ensure that the stabilizationtakes place in conformance with Part 264 standards. However, the Agencyalso acknowledges that stabilization is a more complex process than thefour processes identified in G(1)(d), and it recognizes the concerns ofthe negotiating committee and others about the addition of new units atfacilities. Therefore, the Agency is not prepared at this time to includestabilization units in Category G(1)(d). It should be noted, however, thatstabilzation tanks_particularly when used for closure and corrective action_mayoften be eligible for temporary authorizations under andSection; 270.42(e).Item G(3) in the proposal would have allowed replacement of tanks as aClass 1 modification, as long as the new tank had a capacity of +/^ 10%of the old tank. However, the facility owner or operator was prohibitedfrom using the additional capacity. Comment was requested on whether itis necessary to prohibit the owner/operator's use of the additional 10%capacity. Commenters overwhelmingly opposed the prohibition, arguing thatsuch a prohibition would be difficult to implement, monitor, and enforce.EPA agrees and has removed the prohibition from G(3). The 10 percent variationwould be limited to a maximum of 1,500 gallons since tanks of 15,000 gallonsor more are usually made to order and therefore would not have to deviatesignificantly from the original tank size. One commenter stated that the proposed exclusion in G(1)(a) (which listsas Class 3 the addition or modification of a tank unit leading to a greaterthan 25 percent increase in capacity) should refer to G(1)(d) (less than90-day units) rather than G(1)(c) (greater than 90-day units). The finalrule includes an exclusion for both G(1)(c) and G(1)(d) because EPA doesnot believe that a capacity limitation should apply for either of thesemodifications. Several commenters asked EPA to clarify that permit modifications wouldnot be required where tanks (or containers) were operated at a facilityin a manner that was exempt from RCRA permitting. EPA, therefore, explicitlyacknowledges that units excluded from the permit standards of Part 264would not be subject to permit modification procedures. Examples of suchunits are tanks or containers excluded under the generator accumulationprovisions of andSection; 262.34, the exemptions for wastewater treatmentand neutralization tanks of andSection; 264.1(g)(6), and the closed looprecycling exclusion of andSection; 261.4(a)(8). ii. <T3>Surface Impoundments. </T3>The surface impoundment permitting standardsof 40 CFR Part 264, Subpart K are designed to prevent any migration ofwastes out of the impoundment to adjacent soil, ground-water, or surfacewater. EPA has decided to allow Class 2 permit modifications involvingsurface impoundments only under the following circumstances: (1) Changesto an impoundment that do not increase the unit's capacity and that donot modify the liner, leak detection system, or leachate collection system,(2) changes to management practices at the impoundment, and (3) additionof new wastes under certain circumstances (as discussed in Section IV.C.5of the preamble). Class 3 permit modifications are required for other changes,such as increased capacity or replacement of an impoundment. This approachis consistent with the proposal. One commenter questioned how an improvement to a liner would be classifiedunder Section H. The commenter's confusion on this point reflected thefact that the section on surface impoundment modifications in AppendixI of the proposal was not as complete as the sections for comparable units,such as landfills and waste piles. The final rule has been modified sothat the surface impoundment modifications parallel those for landfillsand unenclosed waste piles. This revision answers the commenter's concern;improvement to a liner without increasing the capacity of the impoundmentwould now be processed as a Class 2 change under H(3). iii. <T3>Waste Piles. </T3>EPA has developed separate permit modification categoriesfor two general types of waste piles. The first type of waste pile is onethat is not inside or under a cover providing protection from precipitation,or that otherwise does not qualify for the exemptions provided in andSection;264.250(c). Such units are referred to as ``unenclosed waste piles,'' andare treated in the same manner as landfills for purposes of permit modifications.Since unenclosed waste piles are subject to essentially the same design,operating, monitoring, and inspection requirements as landfills, the Agencyhas decided that the permit modification requirements for these waste pileunits should also be similar. The specific landfill permit modificationrequirements are discussed in the following section. The second type of waste pile unit is the ``enclosed waste pile''_i.e.,waste piles that comply with andSection; 264.250(c). Such waste piles areexempt from the ground-water monitoring requirements of Subpart F and fromthe andSection; 264.251 requirements for liners, leachate collection systems,run-on and run-off control, and wind dispersal control. Section I of theappendix lists the modifications for enclosed waste piles. Note that Item I(1)(b) treats unit changes or additions resulting in acapacity increase of 25 percent or less as Class 2 modifications. Thisis the same as for tank and container units. Further discussion of theoperation and limitations of this Class 2 change can be found in SectionIV.C.6.i above. One commenter pointed out correctly that two references to andSection; 265.250(c)in modification I should read andSection; 264.250(c). This change has beenmade. Another commenter argued that Item I(3) should be reclassified asClass 2 unless the replacement waste pile will be in the same locationas the old one. The commenter is concerned that the location will influencethe structural stability of the enclosure and the potential for flooding.However, EPA disagrees because the unit must be of the same design as theprevious unit and meet all of the waste pile conditions in the permit.iv. <T3>Landfills. </T3>The permitting standards for landfills are found in40 CFR Part 264, Subpart N. The list of permit modifications for landfillsare presented in Section J of Appendix I. (As discussed above, these modificationsalso apply to unenclosed waste piles.) EPA lists most changes at landfill facilities as Class 3 modifications.Class 2 applies only to changes that: (1) Do not affect a liner, leachatecollection or detection system, run-off control or final cover system,(2) affect management practices at the landfill, and (3) involve the additionof new wastes under certain circumstances (see Section IV.C.5 of the preamble).v. <T3>Land Treatment Units. </T3>The list of modifications to land treatmentfacilities relate primarily to changes in land treatment operating practices,monitoring of the unsaturated zone, and the treatment demonstration. Theitems listed are specific and self-explanatory.  In general, commenters on the proposal suggested the reclassification ofcertain land treatment permit modifications to expand the scope of Class1 changes. One commenter suggested dividing K(2), modification of run-oncontrol, into K(2)(a) for changes that decrease the amount of run-on (Class1) and K(2)(b) for other changes (Class 2). The same commenter also suggesteddividing K(3), modification of run-off control systems, into K(3)(a) forchanges that involve management of non-hazardous run-off (Class 2) andK(3)(b) for changes that involve management of hazardous run-off (Class3). Two commenters suggested that K(6) should be revised to split out anypractice which would only lower the rate of waste application and to allowthis change to be Class 1. Although the intent of the commenters is understandable,the Agency is particularly concerned about run-on and run-off systems atland treatment facilities. Therefore, EPA is amending K(6) to allow ClassI procedures for activities that only decrease the waste application rate,but is not amending K(2) and K(3). The Agency, however, emphasizes thatmost of the concerns of the commenter could be addressed through carefullywritten permits, allowing flexibility in run-off and run-on standards.Three commenters argued that K(7), which addresses certain changes in managementpractices, should be reclassified as a Class 1 modification for activitiesthat improve the efficiency and operation of land treatment operations.EPA agrees that improvements in land treatment processes should be encouraged.However, it can be a difficult question in any given circumstance to determinewhether a specific change will lead to an improvement. Therefore, the Agencyhas not revised K(7). At the same time, the Agency believes that many ofthe concerns identified by the commenters can be addressed through reasonableflexibility in permit writing. In addition, a land treatment owner or operatorwishing to experiment with new methods to improve treatment might in somecases qualify for a temporary authorization. One commenter stated that K(12), which deals with changes in backgroundlevels, should be a Class 2 modification to be consistent with proposedC(6), since both concern the establishment of background values. EPA agreesthat these two items are similar and should have comparable classifications.Thus, item K(12) has been reclassified as Class 2 to be consistent withthe previously discussed ground-water classification. One commenter argued that K(15), minor changes to a land treatment permitto reflect the results of the treatment demonstration, is basically thesame as a minor modification under the current regulations and supportedthe reclassification of this item as a Class 1 modification. Since theprocedures for a minor modification and a Class 1 modification with priorDirector approval are similar, and the Agency is not aware of any difficultiescaused by application of the minor modification procedures to these situations,K(15) is listed as a Class 1 modification, with prior Director approval,in the final rule. EPA has made several conforming changes to the land treatment demonstrationpermitting provisions of andSection; 270.63. Section 270.63(d) formerly specifiedprocedures for modifying the second phase of a land treatment permit basedon results of field tests or laboratory analyses. However, these procedureswere designed, in part, to provide the owner or operator an opportunityto appeal the Director's decision on conditions in the second phase permit.Since this rule's modification approach provides for the appeal of anypermit modification (see discussion at IV.B.6 above), there is no needto specify special appeals procedures. Therefore, andSection; 270.63(d)(2)no longer will reference minor modifications. In addition, as a conformingchange EPA has deleted the reference to minor modification in Section (d)(1),and combined existing Sections (d)(3) with (d)(1) for simplicity. vi. <T3>Incinerators. </T3>Section L of Appendix I presents the classificationsof permit modifications for incinerators. This Section is slightly reorganizedfrom the proposal. Items L(1) and (2) address modifications to incineratorsthat result in capacity increases. Measures of incinerator capacity commonlyused in permits are: (1) Thermal feed rate, (2) waste feed rate, or (3)organic chlorine feed rate. A Class 2 permit modification may be obtainedfor capacity increases up to 25 percent; beyond that, a Class 3 is required.Item L(3) specifies particular unit modifications that require the Class3 approval process even if these changes result in less than a 25 percentcapacity increase. This is because they can directly affect the achievementof the performance standards specified in the permit. Changes in Items L(1), (2), and (3) require trial burns unless the Directordecides that the information that would be gained through the trial burncan be reasonably developed through other means. Items L(1), (2), and (3)allow the Director to waive the required trial burn if the permittee canmake an acceptable demonstration that the performance standards would bemet. Current EPA requirements pertaining to trial burns allow substitutedemonstrations in lieu of trial burns under certain circumstances_normallywhere data are available from operational or trial burns at similar units.(See andSection;andSection; 270.19(c), 270.62(b)(5), and 264.244(c).) The languageis consistent with existing incinerator regulations. This language alsoappears in Items L(5)(a) and L(6)(a). In the proposal, replacement of unit components with functionally equivalentcomponents, was addressed in proposed Item L(3). This item has been droppedfrom the final rule since it is covered by item A(3). One commenter suggestedthat this provision should allow replacement of incinerator unit componentswith improved components. EPA believes that the definition of ``functionallyequivalent'' provided in andSection; 270.2 allows sufficient latitude forthese types of changes under A(3). See preamble Section IV.C.2 for furtherdiscussion on Item A(3).  Item L(4) addresses changes to incinerator operating or monitoring requirementsnot likely to affect compliance with performance standards. Examples ofthese Class 2 changes include modification of the waste feed systems, quenchsystems, kiln refractory, or control instrumentation. The Director mayrequire a trial burn if the modification could affect the capability ofthe incinerator to meet performance standards or could significantly changethe operating conditions. Changes to operating requirements are identified in Item L(5). Alterationof operating requirements that relate to the unit's capability to meetperformance standards are designated Class 3 modifications. Changes toother operating requirements can be made under the Class 2 process. Trialburns may be required for the changes listed in Item L(5)(a). Due to the nature of the trial burn and shakedown periods for new incinerators,changes often need to be made in the trial burn plan or in the permit conditionsthat apply to the incinerator before and immediately after the trial burnis conducted. Such changes are in Item L(7). Note that Items L(7) (b),(c), and (d) are essentially unchanged from the current minor modificationsin andSection; 270.42 (k), (j), and (i).One commenter expressed the opinion that positive changes designed to improvethe pollution control mechanisms or the destruction capacities of incineratorsunder Item L(3) (formerly Item L(1)(c)) should be encouraged through aClass 1 designation. This is not feasible because technical changes toincinerator systems cannot easily be determined to be ``positive'' changes.Thus, a higher level of review, perhaps including a trial burn, is requiredto evaluate the actual effects of these types of system alterations onthe environment. Another commenter requested that improved inspection or recordkeeping proceduresin Item L(5)(c) be Class 1 modifications. This issue was addressed earlier_increasedinspections or recordkeeping would not adversely affect permit conditionsand therefore do not require modification. The same commenter argued thatwastes identified in the same waste codes as those previously incineratedshould not be considered new wastes for the purposes of permit modificationunder Item L(6). The language of L(6) clearly indicates that the determiningfactor for whether a waste is considered new or not is the presence orabsence of a Principal Organic Hazardous Constituent (POHC) that is moredifficult to burn than authorized by the permit. Thus, the waste code isrelevant only to the extent that wastes with the same waste code may havesimilar POHCs. EPA is not amending this modification as suggested becausethe incinerator permit standards are based on the presence or absence ofPOHCs, not on waste codes. Another commenter suggested that the term ``more difficult to incinerate''in L(6)(a) and L(6)(b) be replaced with ``having a heat of combustion lowerthan the minimum.'' Heat of combustion has been suggested in past EPA guidanceas one method to rank the incinerability of compounds. However, other incinerabilityranking methods may be preferable to heat of combustion on a technicalbasis. Therefore, the suggested revision would make the regulation overlyspecific and narrow, and has not been incorporated. An additional commenter argued that L(8), substitution of an alternatefuel, should be reclassified Class 2 or 3, due to the concern that fuelsubstitution could substantially alter the performance of the incinerator.EPA does not believe that this is a major concern since compliance withthe destruction and emission levels required by the regulations can bemaintained by making adjustments when various fuels are used so that theincinerator maintains the operating conditions at which its destructionand removal efficiency (DRE) was demonstrated in the trial burn, as specifiedin the permit. <ITAG tagnum="81">7. Closure </ITAG>The closure activities identified in Section D of Appendix I stem fromPart 264 Subpart G. Since andSection; 264.112(a) specifies that the approvedclosure plan becomes incorporated as a condition of the permit, any changesto the plan must be made through the permit modification process. The classificationof specific closure plan changes is presented in Appendix I, Item D(1).Item D(1) classifies various changes to facility closure plans. This itemhas been somewhat revised since the proposal, because of public commentand further analysis of closure procedures. The major changes are discussedbelow. First, Item D(1)(a)_estimate of maximum extent of operations and maximuminventory of wastes on site_is now categorized as a Class 1 modificationwith Director approval. In the proposal, the two estimates were treatedseparately. A change in the estimate of the maximum extent of operationwas proposed to be Class 2, and a change in the estimate of maximum inventoryof wastes was identified as a Class 1 change (without Director approval).These modifications, however, are of minor significance to the overallmanagement of the facility and to human health and safety. They reflectthe owner or operator's estimate of his or her actual and future activitiesat the facility, but the estimates in no case could exceed the facility'spermitted capacity. Therefore, EPA believes that only limited review isnecessary. However, because these estimates are critical in defining thescope of the closure plan and, in particular, the amount of financial assurancecarried for closure, EPA believes that prior approval of changes in estimatesshould be required before the Class 1 modification takes effect. Consequently,changes to these estimates are established as Class 1 modifications withprior Director approval in today's rule. Second, Item D(1)(b)_changes in the closure schedule for any unit, includingapproval of closure periods longer than 90 days or 180 days under andSection;264.113 (a) and (b)_was proposed as a Class 2 modification. The extensionof the closure period beyond 90 and 180 days had previously been classifiedas a minor modification. EPA does not believe that the procedures for requestingthis modification should be substantially changed, and therefore is classifyingextensions of the closure period under andSection; 264.113 (a) and (b) asClass 1 modifications, with the Director's approval. In general, changesin closure schedules will involve modification of interim dates withinthe 90 and 180-day closure time periods. Even in cases where the periodis extended beyond these dates, the changes will be relatively minor, aslong as other modifications of the closure plan were not involved. Typically,they reflect delays due to equipment problems, bad weather, or similarfactors. Where the delay also involves substantive modifications of theclosure plan, those modifications have to undergo the permit modificationprocedures appropriate for that class of change. Two other entries in Item D(1) have also been changed from the proposalin response to comments. First, D(1)(c), changes in estimates of the expectedyear of closure, has been changed from Class 1 to Class 1 with Directorapproval. Although a change in estimated year of closure is minor in termsof public health and the environment, it is important in determining thepay-in period for the closure trust fund. (In fact, current regulationsrequire the owner or operator to estimate the date of final closure onlyif he or she is relying on a trust fund for financial assurance for closure.)Agency approval of changes in this estimate is necessary, because theymay affect the pay-in rate to a trust fund and therefore the facility'sfinancial assurance. Second, D(1)(d), changes in procedures for decontaminationof facility equipment or structures, has been changed from Class 2 to Class1, with Director approval. The Part 264 closure regulations establish generalstandards for decontamination, which have to be met in every case. Thespecific procedural details of how decontamination will be achieved aretechnical and generally best suited for a Class 1 designation.Items D(2) and D(3) deal with permit modifications to allow the use ofnew units_for example, treatment tanks_ during closure. In some cases,the use of specific units during closure may be anticipated in sufficientdetail in the closure plan, and therefore a permit modification will notbe necessary. However, the use of units not covered in the closure planwill generally require a permit modification to amend the plan (see andSection;264.112(c)). In practice, it is often not possible for the permittee orthe Agency, at the time of permit issuance, to anticipate the specificmethods that will be best suited to close a facility ten or more yearsin the future. Therefore, EPA expects that facility owners will frequentlyintroduce units during closure that were not included in the original closureplan. The Agency has decided that the addition of units to perform closure shouldgenerally carry the same classification as adding the same types of unitsfor other reasons (discussed in preceding sections of the preamble). However,the Agency believes it is not necessary to require a Class 3 modificationfor adding tanks, containers, or enclosed waste piles for closure thatresult in a capacity increase of more than 25 percent, as would be thecase if such expansion occurred at an operating facility. Closure activitiesare generally of relatively short duration. Capacity increases resultingfrom the addition of these units to perform closure are temporary becausefollowing their use during closure, these units will also be closed. Therefore,the addition of these three types of units during closure are specifiedas Class 2. Items D (2) and (3) in the Appendix I contain the classificationof these closure activities. EPA has also considered the special case of tanks that neutralization,dewatering, phase separation, and component separation. (See the earlierdiscussion on tanks in Section IV.C.5.i of this preamble.) As describedearlier, the Agency expects these four treatment operations to become increasinglyavailable through the use of MTUs. MTUs are particularly well adapted tocleanup activities and closure of hazardous waste facilities. Therefore,in today's rule, EPA has classified the temporary addition of these specifictank units as a Class 1 modification with required Agency approval. (<T3>See </T3>Item D(3)(f).) This is consistent with the classificationfor these same units if used for fewer than 90 days to perform non-closureactivities. Comment was requested on whether the temporary addition of tanks that performneutralization, dewatering, phase separation, and component separationfor closure activities was appropriately classified in the proposal asa Class 1 modification with prior Agency approval. One comment supportingthis modification was received. Thus, Item D(3)(f) has not been changedfrom the proposal. Many additional changes beyond those listed in Appendix I are likely tobe required for closure plans. EPA and the Negotiating Committee did notattempt to identify every possible change, for example, in the unit-specifictechnical standards for closure. Where a specific change has not been identified,the owner or operator would have the option of using the Class 3 procedures,or requesting the Agency to classify the change under andSection; 270.42(d).EPA, however, emphasizes that many potential changes in closure plans,such as changes in sampling or monitoring, are already included elsewherein Appendix I. EPA also reiterates that, where the introduction of a newunit will require the modification of a facility's closure plan, reviewof the closure plan modification would take place under the same proceduresas those required for the introduction of the new unit. For example, wherenew tanks are added to a facility as a Class 2 change, modifications inthe closure plan to account for those tanks would take place under Class2 procedures as well. <ITAG tagnum="81">8. Post-Closure  </ITAG>Permitted facilities that must conduct post-closure activities must havean approved post-closure plan in their permits and must eventually havea post-closure permit. (<T3>See </T3>andSection;andSection; 264.118(a) and 270.1(c).) Modificationsto post-closure conditions are classified in Section E of Appendix I.<ITAG tagnum="81">9. HSWA Corrective Action </ITAG>Today's rule does not specifically address permit modifications that willtake place as part of the HSWA corrective action process. Corrective action,however, will likely require one or more permit modifications after thepermit has been issued. For example, corrective action permits now beingissued by the Agency require a major permit modification at the time theAgency approves a remedy. During the permit modification regulatory negotiation,EPA and the other negotiators considered the possibility of specificallyaddressing corrective action and categorizing potential modifications asClass 1, 2, or 3. The negotiators, however, decided not to address suchmodifications, because the corrective action program was still under developmentand likely permit modification points were not yet well defined. Instead,EPA will explicitly address corrective action permit modifications as partof the section 3004(u) corrective action rule it is now developing. Inthe meantime, individual permits will specify where permits will be modifiedfor corrective action, and modifications will generally take place underthe procedures of andSection; 270.41. Although today's rule does not specifically address permit modificationsthat will occur during the corrective action process_such as at the pointof remedy approval_it nevertheless provides significant flexibility forcorrective actions voluntarily undertaken by the owner/operator. For example,temporary authorizations would allow an owner/operator to remediate specificproblems more promptly, and the reduced procedures for certain new treatmentunits will promote voluntary action by owner/operators in anticipationof formal EPA action. Therefore, today's rule should substantially facilitatecorrective action at permitted facilities. <ITAG tagnum="81">10. Location of Minor Modifications in Today's Rule </ITAG>In today's restructuring of andSection;andSection; 270.41 and 270.42, the minormodifications previously located in andSection; 270.42 (a) through (p) arenow contained in Appendix I of andSection; 270.42. For the convenience ofthe reader, the following chart cross references the former paragraphsof andSection; 270.42 with their location in Appendix I, and the designatedmodification class is provided. Note that the minor modifications thataddressed management of restricted wastes (andSection; 270.42 (o) and (p))are not covered under a single item in the Appendix. Rather, the specificclassification under today's rule is dependent on the type of unit involved,the magnitude of additional unit capacity requested, and other factors.However, a temporary authorization may be obtained for these restrictedwaste activities as specified in andSection; 270.42(e)(3)(ii)(B). Similarly,although several Appendix I categories address the land treatment modificationsin the former andSection; 270.42(1), temporary authorizations should be availablefor such changes.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Table </T4>1._<T4>Location of Former Minor Modifications in Appendix I</T4><H1>Previous andSection;270.42 Provision</H1><H1>Appendix I Cite</H1><H1>Class</H1>   <ITAG tagnum="1">(a) Typographical errors<D>A.2</D><D>1.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(b) More frequent monitoring or reporting<D>A.4.a</D><D>1.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(c) Change in interim compliance date in a schedule of compliance<D>A.5.a</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(d) Change in owner/operator<D>A.7</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(e) Change in emergency coordinator or equipment<D>B.6.b</D><D>1.   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(f) Change estimates of maximum inventory<D>D.1.b</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(g) Change estimates of expected year or schedules for final closures<D>D.1.b</D><P>E.4</P><D>1.\1\</D><P>1.   </P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(h) Extend time allowed for closure<D>D.1.c</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(i) Minor change in operating requirements in the permit to reflectresults of trial burn<D>L.6.d</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(j) Minor change in operating requirements for conducting a trial burn<D>L.6.c</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(k) Extension of up to 720 hours to determine operational readiness<D>L.6.b</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(l) Minor change in land treatment program to improve treatment<D>Various (see text)</D><D>   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(m) Minor change in land treatment permit to reflect results of treatmentdemonstration<D>K.15</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(n) Allow second land treatment demonstration<D>K.16</D><D>1.\1\   </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(o) Allow treatment or storage of restricted waste in existing units<D>andSection;270.42(e)(3)(ii)(B)</D><D>Temporary authorization.  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(p) Allow treatment or storage of restricted waste in new tank or containerunits provided a major modification is requested<D>andSection;270.42(e)(3)(ii)(B)</D><D>Temporary authorization. </D><F>Note: Class 1\1\ requires prior Director approval.</F></ITAG></ITAG>   <T3>D. Conforming Changes to Permitting Regulations   </T3>As discussed in the preamble to the proposal, EPA has identified severalother areas in the current RCRA permitting regulations_in addition to andSection;andSection;270.41and 270.42_that need to be made consistent with today's rule. One commentersuggested three additional items that should also be changed. Therefore,today's rule adopts conforming changes to Parts 124, 264, 265, and 270as presented in the proposal, with the additions suggested by the commenter,as discussed below.  Section 124.5 generally identifies which permit modifications must followthe full Part 124 permitting procedures. In andSection; 124.5(c) we are addinga reference to andSection; 270.42(c)_procedures for Class 3 permit modifications_toindicate that Class 3 changes must comply with the Part 124 procedures.Also, andSection; 124.5(c)(3) is modified today to remove the reference toRCRA ``minor modifications'' and replace it with ``Classes 1 and 2 modifications,''indicating that they are not subject to the full permitting requirements. Part 264 specifies that the permittee must request a permit modificationto amend an approved closure plan (andSection; 264.112(c)) or post-closureplan (andSection; 264.118(d)). The request must include a copy of the amendedplan for approval by the Agency. However, since today's rule allows certainchanges to closure or post-closure plans as Class 1 modifications, in suchcases the permittee would not ``request'' a modification or seek ``approval''of the amended plan. Instead, the permittee would notify the Agency ofthe Class 1 change. (See Section IV.B.1 for detailed discussion.) Thereis no Agency approval necessary for the Class 1 changes to these plans.Therefore, EPA is amending andSection;andSection; 264.112(c) and 264.118(d)to allow ``written notification'' of Class 1 modifications. Also in Part264, the comment at andSection; 264.54 ia deleted since it describes minormodifications to contingency plans that would be inconsistent with today'snew classification system. Several conforming changes are identified for Part 270. First, three definitionsare added to andSection; 270.2. ``Facility mailing list'' is defined as meaningthe list maintained by the Agency in accordance with andSection; 124.10(c)(viii);this list is used to notify interested parties of permit modifications(as discussed in Section IV.B of this preamble). ``Component'' and ``functionallyequivalent component'' are included in the definition section to more clearlyspecify the types of equipment changes that are allowed as Class 1 modificationsin accordance with Item A(3) of Appendix I (discussed in Section IV.C.1above).  In a second change to Part 270, EPA is adding a provision to andSection;270.4(a) stating ``the permit may be modified upon the request of the permitteeas set forth in andSection; 270.42.'' This change is necessary to coincidewith the restructuring of andSection; 270.42 to address only permittee-initiatedmodifications.  Another change is made to andSection; 270.30(1)(2) since this provision didnot allow the permittee to use the modified portion of the facility untila certification was submitted to the Agency indicating the modificationwas in accordance with the permit and the Agency has an opportunity toinspect the modification. Under today's modification scheme, the requirementsof andSection; 270.30(l)(2) are not appropriate in many cases, particularlyfor Class 1 modifications and automatic authorizations. Therefore, theamendment to this provision allows the use of the modified portion of thefacility as long as such use is in conformance with andSection; 270.42. Finally, EPA is deleting the reference to ``minor modification'' in andSection;270.40(a) (transfer of permits by modification) and andSection; 270.62 (incineratorpermits). These provisions continue to reference the permittee-initiatedmodifications that are available under andSection; 270.42. <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Other Issues </ITAG>A. Permit Modification Form  Currently, there is no prescribed format for submitting permit modificationrequests. The RCRA regulations provide that in the case of a permit modification,the Director may require the submission of an updated permit application.(See andSection; 124.5(c).) Today's changes to andSection; 270.42 provide amore specific indication of the information that the permittee would haveto submit. However, even with these changes, each permittee seeking a permitmodification will have to decide the most appropriate way to assemble hisor her submission.  In the proposal, EPA solicited comments on the desirability of a standardizedform designed specifically for permit modification requests. The proposaldiscussed general objectives for such a form and suggested items that mightbe included. Three commenters supported the development of a form, whileone commenter opposed the use of a form saying that the format for a permitmodification should be left up to the permittee to proivde maximum flexibility. EPA is not pursuing any further action on the permit modification formin today's rulemaking, but will instead continue to consider the meritsof that approach for possible future action. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. State Authority </ITAG>A. Applicability of Rules in Authorized States  Under section 3006 of RCRA, EPA may authorize qualified States to administerand enforce the RCRA program within the State. (See 40 CFR Part 271 forthe standards and requirements for authorization.) Following authorization,EPA retains enforcement authority under sections 3008, 7003, and 3013 ofRCRA, although authorized States have primary enforcement responsibility. Prior to the Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984 (HSWA), a Statewith final authorization administered its hazardous waste program entirelyin lieu of the Federal progam. The Federal requirements no longer appliedin the authorized State, and EPA could not issue permits for any facilitiesin the State where the State was authorized to issue permits. When new,more stringent Federal requirements were promulgated or enacted, the Statewas obliged to enact equivalent authority within specified time frames.New Federal requirements did not take effect in an authorized State untilthe State adopted the requirements as State law.  In contrast, under section 3006(g) of RCRA, 42 U.S.C 6926(g), new requirementsand prohibitions imposed by HSWA take effect in authorized States at thesame time that they take effect in nonauthorized States. EPA is directedto carry out those requirements and prohibitions in authorized States,including the issuance of permits, until the State is granted authorizationto do so. While States must still adopt HSWA-related provisions as Statelaw to retain final authorization, the HSWA requirements are applied byEPA in authorized States in the interim. B. Effect on State Authorizations  Today's rule is imposed pursuant to pre-HSWA authority. Therefore, thesenew permit modification procedures are applicable in those States thatdo not have interim or final authorization. In authorized States, the newprocedures may not be used to modify State-issued permits unless the Staterevises its program to adopt equivalent requirements under State law. However,EPA may use today's permit modification procedures in authorized Stateswhere necessary to implement HSWA provisions (e.g., for modifying EPA-issuedHSWA permits to allow compliance with corrective action, land disposalrestrictions, or other HSWA requirements).It should be noted that authorized States are only required to modify theirprograms when EPA promulgates Federal standards that are more stringentor broader in scope than the existing Federal standards. Section 3009 ofRCRA allows States to impose standards more stringent than or in additionto those in the Federal program. The amendments in today's rule are notconsidered to be more stringent than the existing Federal requirements.Therefore, authorized States are not required to modify their programsto adopt requirements equivalent to the provisions contained in today'srule.  The Agency recognizes that there are several aspects to today's rule thatcould be viewed as more stringent than the current major/minor modificationsystem. For example, there are public notification requirements for Class1 modifications, whereas no notification is required for similar minormodifications. However, these notifications were established as a tradeofffor allowing the facility to proceed with the changes without approval.(There is no counterpart in the existing minor modification process forthese immediate modifications without prior approval.) As in this example,the other aspects of today's rule that could be considered more stringentare integral parts of this new modification approach and are not applicableto the existing major/minor modification process. Therefore, the Agencydecided that today's rule, when considered in its entirety, is not morestringent than the major/minor modification process which it replaces.C. State Authorization Options  Although today's permit modification rule is deemed to be not more stringentthan the major/minor modification process it replaces, EPA believes thatthis new approach will contribute to more efficient and effective Stateprograms. The need to revise the existing permit modification process wasacknowledged by the Regulatory Negotiation Committee that developed thebasis for the September 23, 1987 proposed rule, and the vast majority ofcommenters on the proposal echoed that changes in the system are desirable.For these reasons, as well as the other reasons discussed throughout thepreamble, EPA strongly encourages states to adopt this permit modificationrule as promulgated.  Several States indicated concerns about the automatic authorization (``default'')provision in the Class 2 process since it would conflict with existingstate laws. Although the default provision is an important feature of today'srule, the Agency does not want to prevent states from adopting these newpermit modification procedures solely because the state is unable or unwillingto pick up the default mechanism. Therefore, states may receive authorizationfor today's rule without incorporating the Class 2 default procedure; however,such states will be expected to process these Class 2 modification requestspromptly (e.g., generally within the 120 days allowed in the Class 2 process),or within 300 days if a temporary authorization is in effect). It is especiallyimportant that prompt action be taken on facility modifications involvingcorrective action or new treatment capabilities.  Even in States that may want to retain the basic major/minor modificationprocess, there are certain parts of today's rule that they may want toadopt. States may amend their programs to incorporate selected portionsof this rule so long as the overall effect of their program is no lessstringent than the Federal program. Examples of possible components oftoday's rule that States could adopt are discussed below. <ITAG tagnum="81">New Waste Provision  </ITAG>Agency efforts to promulgate a revised toxicity characteristic and otheractions to list new wastes will generate a significant number of permitmodifications. The new procedure in andSection; 270.42(g) corrects an inequityin the treatment of permitted facilities in comparison to interim statusfacilities and should result in much less disruption of waste managementwhen new wastes are identified. <ITAG tagnum="81">Class 1 Modifications  </ITAG>These Class 1 procedures could be added as a supplement to the major/minorsystem to provide for prompt implementation of the Class 1 changes identifiedin Appendix I. In this case, those Class 1 changes that require prior directorapproval should follow the minor modification procedures while the remainingClass 1 changes would just require notification to the Director. Anotheralternative would be to just add all the Class 1 items in Appendix I tothe state's list of minor modifications. <ITAG tagnum="81">Temporary Authorizations  </ITAG>With this mechanism the Director can allow a facility to respond promptlyto closure activities, corrective action, sudden changes in the types orquantities of wastes managed at the facility, etc. <ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Effective Date  </ITAG>This rule will be effective 30 days after final promulgation. Section 3010(b)of RCRA provides that regulations concerning permits for the treatment,storage, or disposal of hazardous waste shall take effect six months afterthe date of promulgation. However, section 3010(b)(1) provides for a shorterperiod if the Agency finds that the regulated community does not need sixmonths to comply with the new regulation.  Since today's rule is designed to expedite permit modifications requestedby the regulated community, the Agency believes that the regulated communitywill not need six months to come into compliance. Therefore, these amendmentsare effective 30 days after promulgation, as provided under the AdministrativeProcedure Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Regulatory Analysis </ITAG>A. Regulatory Impact Analysis Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must determine whether a regulation is``major'' and thus whether EPA must prepare and consider a Regulatory ImpactAnalysis in connection with the rule. Today's rule is not major becauseit will not result in an annual effect on the economy of $100 million ormore, nor will it result in an increase in costs or prices to industry.There will be no adverse impact on the ability of the U.S.-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.Therefore, the Agency does not believe a Regulatory Impact Analysis isrequired for today's rule. Today's rule has been submitted to the Officeof Management and Budget (OMB) for review in accordance with ExecutiveOrder 12291. B. Regulatory Flexibility Act Under the Regulatory Flexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq., </T3>at the time an agency publishes any proposed or finalrule, it must prepare a regulatory flexibility analysis that describesthe impact of the rule on small entities unless the Administrator certifiesthat the rule will not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities. The amendments in today's rule provide additional flexibility for hazardouswaste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities to undertake changesand overall do not affect the compliance burdens of the regulated community.Therefore, pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 601(b), I certify that this regulationwill not have a significant economic impact on a substantial number ofsmall entities. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>40 CFR Part 124 Administrative practice and procedure, Hazardous waste, Waste treatmentand disposal. 40 CFR Part 264 Corrective action, Hazardous waste, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Waste treatment and disposal. 40 CFR Part 265 Corrective action, Hazardous waste, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Waste treatment and disposal. 40 CFR Part 270 Administrative practice and procedure, Hazardous waste, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements, Permit application requirements, Permit modification procedures,Waste treatment and disposal. <ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 12, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG>Therefore, Subchapter I of Title 40 is amended as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 124_PROCEDURES FOR DECISIONMAKING </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 124 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. 6901<T3>et seq.; </T3>Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. 300(f) <T3>et seq.; </T3>Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 <T3>et seq.; </T3>and Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 1857 <T3>et seq</T3>. </ITAG>2. Section 124.5 is amended by revising paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(3) toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;124.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Modification revocation and reissuance, or termination of permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>(Applicable to State programs, see andSection;andSection;123.25 (NPDES,145.11 (UIC), 233.26 (404), and 271.14 (RCRA)). </T3>(1) If the Directortentatively decides to modify or revoke and reissue a permit under andSection;andSection;122.62(NPDES), 144.39 (UIC), 233.14 (404), or 270.41 or 270.42(c) (RCRA), heor she shall prepare a draft permit under andSection;124.6 incorporatingthe proposed changes. The Director may request additional information and,in the case of a modified permit, may require the submission of an updatedapplication. In the case of revoked and reissued permits, the Directorshall require the submission of a new application. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) ``Minor modifications'' as defined in andSection;andSection;122.63 (NPDES),144.41 (UIC), and 233.16 (404), and ``Classes 1 and 2 modifications'' asdefined in andSection;270.42 (a) and (b) (RCRA) are not subject to the requirementsof this section. <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 264_STANDARDS FOR OWNERS AND OPERATORS OF HAZARDOUS WASTE TREATMENT,STORAGE, AND DISPOSAL FACILITIES </ITAG>3. The authority citation for Part 264 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912(a), 6924, and 6925. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;264.54 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>4. Section 264.54 is amended by removing the comment. 5. In andSection;264.112, paragraph (c) introductory text, (c)(1), and (c)(2)are revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;264.112 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Closure plan; amendment of plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Amendment of plan. </T3>The owner or operator must submit a writtennotification of or request for a permit modification to authorize a changein operating plans, facility design, or the approved closure plan in accordancewith the applicable procedures in Parts 124 and 270. The written notificationor request must include a copy of the amended closure plan for review orapproval by the Regional Administrator. (1) The owner or operator may submit a written notification or requestto the Regional Administrator for a permit modification to amend the closureplan at any time prior to the notification of partial or final closureof the facility. (2) The owner or operator must submit a written notification of or requestfor a permit modification to authorize a change in the approved closureplan whenever: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>6. In andSection;264.118, paragraphs (d) introductory text, (d)(1), and (d)(2)introductory text, are revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;264.118 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Post-closure plan; amendment of plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Amendment of plan. </T3>The owner or operator must submit a writtennotification of or request for a permit modification to authorize a changein the approved post-closure plan in accordance with the applicable requirementsin Parts 124 and 270. The written notification or request must includea copy of the amended post-closure plan for review or approval by the RegionalAdministrator. (1) The owner or operator may submit a written notification or requestto the Regional Administrator for a permit modification to amend the post-closureplan at any time during the active life of the facility or during the post-closurecare period. (2) The owner or operator must submit a written notification of or requestfor a permit modification to authorize a change in the approved post-closureplan whenever: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 265_INTERIM STATUS STANDARDS FOR OWNERS AND OPERATORS OF HAZARDOUSWASTE TREATMENT, STORAGE AND DISPOSAL FACILITIES </ITAG>6a. The authority citation for Part 265 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912(a), 6924, and 6925. </ITAG>7. In andSection;265.112, the last sentences in paragraphs (c)(3) and (c)(4)are revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;265.112 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Closure plan; amendment of plan. </ITAG>(c) * * * (3) * * * If the amendment to the plan is a Class 2 or 3 modification accordingto the criteria in andSection;270.42, the modification to the plan will beapproved according to the procedures in andSection;265.112(d)(4). (4) * * * If the amendment is considered a Class 2 or 3 modification accordingto the criteria in andSection;270.42, the modification to the plan will beapproved in accordance with the procedures in andSection;265.112(d)(4). <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>8. In andSection;265.118, the last sentence in paragraph (d)(3) and the thirdsentence in paragraph (d)(4) are revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;265.118 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Post-closure plan; amendment of plan. </ITAG>(d) * * * (3) * * * If the amendment to the post-closure plan is a Class 2 or 3 modificationaccording to the criteria in andSection; 270.42, the modification to theplan will be approved according to the procedures in andSection; 265.118(f).(4) * * * If the amendment to the plan is considered a Class 2 or 3 modificationaccording to the criteria in andSection; 270.42, the modifications to thepost-closure plan will be approved in accordance with the procedures inandSection; 265.118(f). * * *<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 270_EPA ADMINISTERED PERMIT PROGRAMS: THE HAZARDOUS WASTE PERMITPROGRAM</ITAG>9. The authority citation for Part 270 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 6905, 6912, 6924, 6925, 6927, 6939, and 6974.</ITAG>10. Section 270.2 is amended by adding the following terms and definitionsin alphabetical order:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Component </T3>means any constituent part of a unit or any group ofconstituent parts of a unit which are assembled to perform a specific function(e.g., a pump seal, pump, kiln liner, kiln thermocouple).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Facility mailing list </T3>means the mailing list for a facility maintainedby EPA in accordance with 40 CFR 124.10(c)(viii).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Functionally equivalent component </T3>means a component which performsthe same function or measurement and which meets or exceeds the performancespecifications of another component.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>11. In andSection; 270.4, the last sentence of paragraph (a) is revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effect of a permit.</ITAG>(a) * * * However, a permit may be modified, revoked and reissued, or terminatedduring its term for cause as set forth in andSection;andSection; 270.41 and270.43, or the permit may be modified upon the request of the permitteeas set forth in andSection; 270.42.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>12. In andSection; 270.30, paragraph (l)(2) introductory text is revisedto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conditions applicable to all permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(l) * * *(2) <T3>Anticipated noncompliance. </T3>The permittee shall give advance noticeto the Director of any planned changes in the permitted facility or activitywhich may result in noncompliance with permit requirements. For a new facility,the permittee may not treat, store, or dispose of hazardous waste; andfor a facility being modified, the permittee may not treat, store, or disposeof hazardous waste in the modified portion of the facility except as providedin andSection; 270.42, until:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>13. Section 270.40 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transfer of permits.</ITAG>(a) A permit may be transferred by the permittee to a new owner or operatoronly if the permit has been modified or revoked and reissued (under andSection;270.40(b) or andSection; 270.41(b)(2)) to identify the new permittee andincorporate such other requirements as may be necessary under the appropriateAct.(b) Changes in the ownership or operational control of a facility may bemade as a Class 1 modification with prior written approval of the Directorin accordance with andSection; 270.42. The new owner or operator must submita revised permit application no later than 90 days prior to the scheduledchange. A written agreement containing a specific date for transfer ofpermit responsibility between the current and new permittees must alsobe submitted to the Director. When a transfer of ownership or operationalcontrol occurs, the old owner or operator shall comply with the requirementsof 40 CFR Part 264, Subpart H (Financial Requirements) until the new owneror operator has demonstrated that he or she is complying with the requirementsof that Subpart. The new owner or operator must demonstrate compliancewith Subpart H requirements within six months of the date of the changeof ownership or operational control of the facility. Upon demonstrationto the Director by the new owner or operator of compliance with SubpartH, the Director shall notify the old owner or operator that he or she nolonger needs to comply with Subpart H as of the date of demonstration.14. Section 270.41 is amended by revising the section heading, the introductorytext and paragraph (a)(3) and by removing paragraph (a)(5), and redesignatingexisting paragraph (a)(6) as (a)(5) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Modification or revocation and reissuance of permits.</ITAG>When the Director receives any information (for example, inspects the facility,receives information submitted by the permittee as required in the permit(see andSection; 270.30), receives a request for revocation and reissuanceunder andSection; 124.5 or conducts a review of the permit file), he or shemay determine whether one or more of the causes listed in paragraphs (a)and (b) of this section for modification, or revocation and reissuanceor both exist. If cause exists, the Director may modify or revoke and reissuethe permit accordingly, subject to the limitations of paragraph (c) ofthis section, and may request an updated application if necessary. Whena permit is modified, only the conditions subject to modification are reopened.If a permit is revoked and reissued, the entire permit is reopened andsubject to revision and the permit is reissued for a new term. (See 40CFR 124.5(c)(2).) If cause does not exist under this section, the Directorshall not modify or revoke and reissue the permit, except on request ofthe permittee. If a permit modification is requested by the permittee,the Director shall approve or deny the request according to the proceduresof 40 CFR 270.42. Otherwise, a draft permit must be prepared and otherprocedures in Part 124 (or procedures of an authorized State program) followed.(a) * * *(3) <T3>New statutory requirements or regulations. </T3>The standards or regulationson which the permit was based have been changed by statute, through promulgationof new or amended standards or regulations, or by judicial decision afterthe permit was issued.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>15. Section 270.42 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permit modification at the request of the permittee.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Class 1 modifications. </T3>(1) Except as provided in paragraph (a)(2)of this section, the permittee may put into effect Class 1 modificationslisted in Appendix I of this section under the following conditions:(i) The permittee must notify the Director concerning the modificationby certified mail or other means that establish proof of delivery within7 calendar days after the change is put into effect. This notice must specifythe changes being made to permit conditions or supporting documents referencedby the permit and must explain why they are necessary. Along with the notice,the permittee must provide the applicable information required by andSection;andSection;270.13 through 270.21, 270.62, and 270.63.(ii) The permittee must send a notice of the modification to all personson the facility mailing list, maintained by the Director in accordancewith 40 CFR 124.10(c)(viii), and the appropriate units of State and localgovernment, as specified in 40 CFR 124.10(c)(ix). This notification mustbe made within 90 calendar days after the change is put into effect. Forthe Class I modifications that require prior Director approval, the notificationmust be made within 90 calendar days after the Director approves the request.(iii) Any person may request the Director to review, and the Director mayfor cause reject, any Class 1 modification. The Director must inform thepermittee by certified mail that a Class 1 modification has been rejected,explaining the reasons for the rejection. If a Class 1 modification hasbeen rejected, the permittee must comply with the original permit conditions.(2) Class 1 permit modifications identified in Appendix I by an asteriskmay be made only with the prior written approval of the Director.(3) For a Class 1 permit modification, the permittee may elect to followthe procedures in andSection; 270.42(b) for Class 2 modifications insteadof the Class 1 procedures. The permittee must inform the Director of thisdecision in the notice required in andSection; 270.42(b)(1).(b) <T3>Class 2 modifications. </T3>(1) For Class 2 modifications, listed inAppendix I of this section, the permittee must submit a modification requestto the Director that:(i) Describes the exact change to be made to the permit conditions andsupporting documents referenced by the permit;(ii) Identifies that the modification is a Class 2 modification;(iii) Explains why the modification is needed; and(iv) Provides the applicable information required by andSection;andSection;270.13 through 270.21, 270.62, and 270.63.(2) The permittee must send a notice of the modification request to allpersons on the facility mailing list maintained by the Director and tothe appropriate units of State and local government as specified in 40CFR 124.10(c)(ix) and must publish this notice in a major local newspaperof general circulation. This notice must be mailed and published within7 days before or after the date of submission of the modification request,and the permittee must provide to the Director evidence of the mailingand publication. The notice must include:(i) Announcement of a 60-day comment period, in accordance with andSection;270.42(b)(5), and the name and address of an Agency contact to whom commentsmust be sent;(ii) Announcement of the date, time, and place for a public meeting heldin accordance with andSection; 270.42(b)(4);(iii) Name and telephone number of the permittee's contact person;(iv) Name and telephone number of an Agency contact person;(v) Location where copies of the modification request and any supportingdocuments can be viewed and copied; and(vi) The following statement: ``The permittee's compliance history duringthe life of the permit being modified is available from the Agency contactperson.''(3) The permittee must place a copy of the permit modification requestand supporting documents in a location accessible to the public in thevicinity of the permitted facility.(4) The permittee must hold a public meeting no earlier than 15 days afterthe publication of the notice required in paragraph (b)(2) of this sectionand no later than 15 days before the close of the 60-day comment period.The meeting must be held to the extent practicable in the vicinity of thepermitted facility.(5) The public shall be provided 60 days to comment on the modificationrequest. The comment period will begin on the date the permittee publishesthe notice in the local newspaper. Comments should be submitted to theAgency contact identified in the public notice.(6)(i) No later than 90 days after receipt of the notification request,the Director must:(A) Approve the modification request, with or without changes, and modifythe permit accordingly;(B) Deny the request;(C) Determine that the modification request must follow the proceduresin andSection; 270.42(c) for Class 3 modifications for the following reasons:(<T3>1</T3>) There is significant public concern about the proposed modification;or(<T3>2</T3>) The complex nature of the change requires the more extensiveprocedures of Class 3.(D) Approve the request, with or without changes, as a temporary authorizationhaving a term of up to 180 days, or(E) Notify the permittee that he or she will decide on the request withinthe next 30 days.(ii) If the Director notifies the permittee of a 30-day extension for adecision, the Director must, no later than 120 days after receipt of themodification request:(A) Approve the modification request, with or without changes, and modifythe permit accordingly;(B) Deny the request; or(C) Determine that the modification request must follow the proceduresin andSection; 270.42(c) for Class 3 modifications for the following reasons:(<T3>1</T3>) There is significant public concern about the proposed modification;or(<T3>2</T3>) The complex nature of the change requires the more extensiveprocedures of Class 3.(D) Approve the request, with or without changes, as a temporary authorizationhaving a term of up to 180 days.(iii) If the Director fails to make one of the decisions specified in paragraph(b)(6)(ii) of this section by the 120th day after receipt of the modificationrequest, the permittee is automatically authorized to conduct the activitiesdescribed in the modification request for up to 180 days, without formalAgency action. The authorized activities must be conducted as describedin the permit modification request and must be in compliance with all appropriatestandards of 40 CFR Part 265. If the Director approves, with or withoutchanges, or denies the modification request during the term of the temporaryor automatic authorization provided for in paragraphs (b)(6) (i), (ii),or (iii) of this section, such action cancels the temporary or automaticauthorization.(iv)(A) In the case of an automatic authorization under paragraph (b)(6)(iii)of this section, or a temporary authorization under paragraph (b)(6) (i)(D)or (ii)(D) of this section, if the Director has not made a final approvalor denial of the modification request by the date 50 days prior to theend of the temporary or automatic authorization, the permittee must withinseven days of that time send a notification to persons on the facilitymailing list, and make a reasonable effort to notify other persons whosubmitted written comments on the modification request, that:(<T3>1</T3>) The permittee has been authorized temporarily to conduct theactivities described in the permit modification request, and(<T3>2</T3>) Unless the Director acts to give final approval or denial ofthe request by the end of the authorization period, the permittee willreceive authorization to conduct such activities for the life of the permit.(B) If the owner/operator fails to notify the public by the date specifiedin paragraph (b)(6)(iv)(A) of this section, the effective date of the permanentauthorization will be deferred until 50 days after the owner/operator notifiesthe public.(v) Except as provided in paragraph (b)(6)(vii) of this section, if theDirector does not finally approve or deny a modification request beforethe end of the automatic or temporary authorization period or reclassifythe modification as a Class 3, the permittee is authorized to conduct theactivities described in the permit modification request for the life ofthe permit unless modified later under andSection; 270.41 or andSection; 270.42.The activities authorized under this paragraph must be conducted as describedin the permit modification request and must be in compliance with all appropriatestandards of 40 CFR Part 265.(vi) In making a decision to approve or deny a modification request, includinga decision to issue a temporary authorization or to reclassify a modificationas a Class 3, the Director must consider all written comments submittedto the Agency during the public comment period and must respond in writingto all significant comments in his or her decision.(vii) With the written consent of the permittee, the Director may extendindefinitely or for a specified period the time periods for final approvalor denial of a modification request or for reclassifying a modificationas a Class 3.(7) The Director may deny or change the terms of a Class 2 permit modificationrequest under paragraphs (b)(6) (i) through (iii) of this section for thefollowing reasons:(i) The modification request is incomplete;(ii) The requested modification does not comply with the appropriate requirementsof 40 CFR Part 264 or other applicable requirements; or(iii) The conditions of the modification fail to protect human health andthe environment.(8) The permittee may perform any construction associated with a Class2 permit modification request beginning 60 days after the submission ofthe request unless the Director establishes a later date for commencingconstruction and informs the permittee in writing before day 60.(c) <T3>Class 3 modifications.</T3> (1) For Class 3 modifications listed inAppendix I of this section, the permittee must submit a modification requestto the Director that:(i) Describes the exact change to be made to the permit conditions andsupporting documents referenced by the permit;(ii) Identifies that the modification is a Class 3 modification;(iii) Explains why the modification is needed; and(iv) Provides the applicable information required by 40 CFR 270.13 through270.21, 270.62 and 270.63.(2) The permittee must send a notice of the modification request to allpersons on the facility mailing list maintained by the Director and tothe appropriate units of State and local government as specified in 40CFR 124.10(c)(ix) and must publish this notice in a major local newspaperof general circulation. This notice must be mailed and published withinseven days before or after the date of submission of the modification request,and the permittee must provide to the Director evidence of the mailingand publication. The notice must include:(i) Announcement of a 60-day comment period, and a name and address ofan Agency contact to whom comments must be sent;(ii) Announcement of the date, time, and place for a public meeting onthe modification request, in accordance with andSection; 270.42(c)(4);(iii) Name and telephone number of the permittee's contact person;(iv) Name and telephone number of an Agency contact person;(v) Location where copies of the modification request and any supportingdocuments can be viewed and copied; and(vi) The following statement: ``The permittee's compliance history duringthe life of the permit being modified is available from the Agency contactperson.''(3) The permittee must place a copy of the permit modification requestand supporting documents in a location accessible to the public in thevicinity of the permitted facility.(4) The permittee must hold a public meeting no earlier than 15 days afterthe publication of the notice required in paragraph (c)(2) of this sectionand no later than 15 days before the close of the 60-day comment period.The meeting must be held to the extent practicable in the vicinity of thepermitted facility.(5) The public shall be provided at least 60 days to comment on the modificationrequest. The comment period will begin on the date the permittee publishesthe notice in the local newspaper. Comments should be submitted to theAgency contact identified in the notice.(6) After the conclusion of the 60-day comment period, the Director mustgrant or deny the permit modification request according to the permit modificationprocedures of 40 CFR Part 124. In addition, the Director must considerand respond to all significant written comments received during the 60-daycomment period.(d) <T3>Other modifications.</T3> (1) In the case of modifications not explicitlylisted in Appendix I of this section, the permittee may submit a Class3 modification request to the Agency, or he or she may request a determinationby the Director that the modification should be reviewed and approved asa Class 1 or Class 2 modification. If the permittee requests that the modificationbe classified as a Class 1 or 2 modification, he or she must provide theAgency with the necessary information to support the requested classification.(2) The Director shall make the determination described in paragraph (d)(1)of this section as promptly as practicable. In determining the appropriateclass for a specific modification, the Director shall consider the similarityof the modification to other modifications codified in Appendix I and thefollowing criteria:(i) Class 1 modifications apply to minor changes that keep the permit currentwith routine changes to the facility or its operation. These changes dono substantially alter the permit conditions or reduce the capacity ofthe facility to protect human health or the environment. In the case ofClass 1 modifications, the Director may require prior approval.(ii) Class 2 modifications apply to changes that are necessary to enablea permittee to respond, in a timely manner, to,(A) Common variations in the types and quantities of the wastes managedunder the facility permit,(B) Technological advancements, and(C) Changes necessary to comply with new regulations, where these changescan be implemented without substantially changing design specificationsor management practices in the permit.(iii) Class 3 modifications substantially alter the facility or its operation.(e) <T3>Temporary authorizations.</T3> (1) Upon request of the permittee, theDirector may, without prior public notice and comment, grant the permitteea temporary authorization in accordance with this subsection. Temporaryauthorizations must have a term of not more than 180 days.(2)(i) The permittee may request a temporary authorization for:(A) Any Class 2 modification meeting the criteria in paragraph (e)(3)(ii)of this section, and(B) Any Class 3 modification that meets the criteria in paragraph (3)(ii)(A) or (B) of this section; or that meets the criteria in paragraphs (3)(ii)(C) through (E) of this section and provides improved management or treatmentof a hazardous waste already listed in the facility permit.(ii) The temporary authorization request must include:(A) A description of the activities to be conducted under the temporaryauthorization;(B) An explanation of why the temporary authorization is necessary; and(C) Sufficient information to ensure compliance with 40 CFR Part 264 standards.(iii) The permittee must send a notice about the temporary authorizationrequest to all persons on the facility mailing list maintained by the Directorand to appropriate units of State and local governments as specified in40 CFR 124.10(c)(ix). This notification must be made within seven daysof submission of the authorization request.(3) The Director shall approve or deny the temporary authorization as quicklyas practical. To issue a temporary authorization, the Director must find:(i) The authorized activities are in compliance with the standards of 40CFR Part 264.(ii) The temporary authorization is necessary to achieve one of the followingobjectives before action is likely to be taken on a modification request:(A) To facilitate timely implementation of closure or corrective actionactivities;(B) To allow treatment or storage in tanks or containers of restrictedwastes in accordance with 40 CFR Part 268;(C) To prevent disruption of ongoing waste management activities;(D) To enable the permittee to respond to sudden changes in the types orquantities of the wastes managed under the facility permit; or(E) To facilitate other changes to protect human health and the environment.(4) A temporary authorization may be reissued for one additional term ofup to 180 days provided that the permittee has requested a Class 2 or 3permit modification for the activity covered in the temporary authorization,and:(i) The reissued temporary authorization constitutes the Director's decisionon a Class 2 permit modification in accordance with paragraph (b)(6)(i)(D)or (ii)(D) of this section, or(ii) The Director determines that the reissued temporary authorizationinvolving a Class 3 permit modification request is warranted to allow theauthorized activities to continue while the modification procedures ofparagraph (c) of this section are conducted.(f) <T3>Public notice and appeals of permit modification decisions. </T3>(1)The Director shall notify persons on the facility mailing list and appropriateunits of State and local government within 10 days of any decision underthis section to grant or deny a Class 2 or 3 permit modification request.The Director shall also notify such persons within 10 days after an automaticauthorization for a Class 2 modification goes into effect under andSection;270.42(b)(6) (iii) or (v).(2) The Director's decision to grant or deny a Class 2 or 3 permit modificationrequest under this section may be appealed under the permit appeal proceduresof 40 CFR 124.19.(3) An automatic authorization that goes into effect under andSection; 270.42(b)(6)(iii) or (v) may be appealed under the permit appeal procedures of 40 CFR124.19; however, the permittee may continue to conduct the activities pursuantto the automatic authorization until the appeal has been granted pursuantto andSection; 124.19(c), notwithstanding the provisions of andSection; 124.15(b).(g) <T3>Newly listed or identified wastes. </T3>(1) The permittee is authorizedto continue to manage wastes listed or identified as hazardous under 40CFR Part 261 if he or she:(i) Was in existence as a hazardous waste facility with respect to thenewly listed or characterized waste on the effective date of the finalrule listing or identifying the waste;(ii) Submits a Class 1 modification request on or before the date on whichthe waste becomes subject to the new requirements;(iii) Is in compliance with the standards of 40 CFR Part 265;(iv) In the case of Classes 2 and 3 modifications, also submits a completepermit modification request within 180 days after the effective date ofthe rule listing or identifying the waste; and(v) In the case of land disposal units, certifies that such unit is incompliance with all applicable Part 265 ground-water monitoring and financialresponsibility requirements on the date 12 months after the effective dateof the rule identifying or listing the waste as hazardous. If the owneror operator fails to clarify compliance with these requirements, he orshe shall lose authority to operate under this section.(2) New wastes or units added to a facility's permit under this subsectiondo not constitute expansions for the purpose of the 25 percent capacityexpansion limit for Class 2 modifications.(h) <T3>Permit modification list. </T3>The Director must maintain a list ofall approved permit modifications and must publish a notice once a yearin a State-wide newspaper that an updated list is available for review.16. In andSection; 270.62, the last sentence of paragraph (a) and the lastsentence of paragraph (b)(10) are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.62 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Hazardous waste incinerator permits.</ITAG>(a) * * * The permit may be modified to reflect the extension accordingto andSection; 270.42 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(10) * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The permit modification shall proceed according to andSection; 270.42.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>17. In andSection; 270.63, paragraph (d)(3) is removed and paragraphs (d)(1)and (d)(2) are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.63 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permits for land treatment demonstrations using field test or laboratoryanalyses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(1) This permit modification may proceed under andSection; 270.42, or otherwisewill proceed as a modification under andSection; 270.41(a)(2). If such modificationsare necessary, the second phase of the permit will become effective onlyafter those modifications have been made.(2) If no modifications of the second phase of the permit are necessary,the Director will give notice of his final decision to the permit applicantand to each person who submitted written comments on the phased permitor who requested notice of the final decision on the second phase of thepermit. The second phase of the permit then will become effective as specifiedin andSection; 124.15(b).18. Section 270.42 is amended by adding Appendix I to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 270.42 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permit modification at the request of the permittee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix I to </ITAG>andSection;270.42_Classification of Permit Modifications<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>Modifications </H1><H1>Class </H1>A. <T3>General Permit Provisions</T3><ITAG tagnum="2">1. Administrative and informational changes <D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">2. Correction of typographical errors <D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Equipment replacement or upgrading with functionally equivalentcomponents (e.g., pipes, valves, pumps, conveyors, controls) <D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">4. Changes in the frequency of or procedures for monitoring, reporting,sampling, or maintenance activities by the permittee:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. To provide for more frequent monitoring, reporting, sampling, ormaintenance. </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Other changes </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="12">5. Schedule of compliance:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Changes in interim compliance dates, with prior approval of theDirector. </ITAG><D/>\1\ 1<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Extension of final compliance date. </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="2">6. Changes in expiration date of permit to allow earlier permit termination,with prior approval of the Director. <D/>\1\ 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">7. Changes in ownership or operational control of a facility, providedthe procedures of andSection; 270.40(b) are followed. <D/>\1\ 1</ITAG>B. <T3>General Facility Standards</T3><ITAG tagnum="12">1. Changes to waste sampling or analysis methods:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. To conform with agency guidance or regulations. </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Other changes </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="12">2. Changes to analytical quality assurance/control plan:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. To conform with agency guidance or regulations. </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Other changes </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="2">3. Changes in procedures for maintaining the operating record. <D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Changes in frequency or content of inspection schedules. <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">5. Changes in the training plan:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. That affect the type or decrease the amount of training given toemployees. </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Other changes </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="12">6. Contingency plan:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Changes in emergency procedures (i.e., spill or release responseprocedures). </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Replacement with functionally equivalent equipment, upgrade, orrelocate emergency equipment listed. </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="3">c. Removal of equipment from emergency equipment list. </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">d. Changes in name, address, or phone number of coordinators or otherpersons or agencies identified in the plan. </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="21"><T2>Note: </T2>When a permit modification (such as introduction of a newunit) requires a change in facility plans or other general facility standards,that change shall be reviewed under the same procedures as the permit modification.</ITAG>C. <T3>Ground-Water Protection</T3><ITAG tagnum="12">1. Changes to wells:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Changes in the number, location, depth, or design of upgradientor downgradient wells of permitted ground-water monitoring system. </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Replacement of an existing well that has been damaged or renderedinoperable, without change to location, design, or depth of the well. </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="2">2. Changes in ground-water sampling or analysis procedures or monitoringschedule, with prior approval of the Director. <D/>\1\ 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Changes in statistical procedure for determining whether a statisticallysignificant change in ground-water quality between upgradient and downgradientwells has occurred, with prior approval of the Director. <D/>\1\ 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Changes in point of compliance. <D/>\1\ 2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">5. Changes in indicator parameters, hazardous constituents, or concentrationlimits (including ACLs): </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. As specified in the groundwater protection standard. </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. As specified in the detection monitoring program </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="2">6. Changes to a detection monitoring program as required by andSection;264.98(j), unless otherwise specified in this appendix <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">7. Compliance monitoring program:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Addition of compliance monitoring program as required by andSection;andSection;264.98(h)(4) and 264.99 </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Changes to a compliance monitoring program as required by andSection;264.99(k), unless otherwise specified in this appendix </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="12">8. Corrective action program:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Addition of a corrective action program as required by andSection;andSection;264.99(i)(2) and 264.100 </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Changes to a corrective action program as required by andSection;264.100(h), unless otherwise specified in this Appendix </ITAG><D/>2D. <T3>Closure</T3><ITAG tagnum="12">1. Changes to the closure plan:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Changes in estimate of maximum extent of operations or maximum inventoryof waste on-site at any time during the active life of the facility, withprior approval of the Director </ITAG><D/>\1\ 1<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Changes in the closure schedule for any unit, changes in the finalclosure schedule for the facility, or extension of the closure period,with prior approval of the Director </ITAG><D/>\1\ 1<ITAG tagnum="3">c. Changes in the expected year of final closure, where other permitconditions are not changed, with prior approval of the Director </ITAG><D/>\1\ 1<ITAG tagnum="3">d. Changes in procedures for decontamination of facility equipmentor structures, with prior approval of the Director </ITAG><D/>\1\ 1<ITAG tagnum="3">e. Changes in approved closure plan resulting from unexpected eventsoccurring during partial or final closure, unless otherwise specified inthis appendix </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="2">2. Creation of a new landfill unit as part of closure <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">3. Addition of the following new units to be used temporarily forclosure activities:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Surface impoundments </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Incinerators </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">c. Waste piles that do not comply with andSection; 264.250(c) </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">d. Waste piles that comply with andSection; 264.250(c) </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">e. Tanks or containers (other than specified below) </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">f. Tanks used for neutralization, dewatering, phase separation, orcomponent separation, with prior approval of the Director </ITAG><D/>\1\ 1E. <T3>Post-Closure</T3><ITAG tagnum="2">1. Changes in name, address, or phone number of contact in post-closureplan <D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">2. Extension of post-closure care period <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Reduction in the post-closure care period <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Changes to the expected year of final closure, where other permitconditions are not changed <D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">5. Changes in post-closure plan necessitated by events occurring duringthe active life of the facility, including partial and final closure <D/>2</ITAG>F. <T3>Containers</T3><ITAG tagnum="12">1. Modification or addition of container units:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Resulting in greater than 25% increase in the facility's containerstorage capacity </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Resulting in up to 25% increase in the facility's container storagecapacity </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="12">2:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Modification of a container unit without increasing the capacityof the unit </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Addition of a roof to a container unit without alteration of thecontainment system </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="12">3. Storage of different wastes in containers:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. That require additional or different management practices from thoseauthorized in the permit </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. That do not require additional or different management practicesfrom those authorized in the permit</ITAG><D/><T2>Note: </T2>See andSection; 270.42(g) for modification procedures to beused for the management of newly listed or identified wastes.<ITAG tagnum="2">4. Other changes in container management practices (e.g., aisle space;types of containers; segregation)<D/>2</ITAG>G. <T3>Tanks</T3><ITAG tagnum="12">1:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Modification or addition of tank units resulting in greater than25% increase in the facility's tank capacity, except as provided in G(1)(c)and G(1)(d) of this appendix</ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Modification or addition of tank units resulting in up to 25% increasein the facility's tank capacity, except as provided in G(1)(d) of thisappendix</ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">c. Addition of a new tank that will operate for more than 90 days usingany of the following physical or chemical treatment technologies: neutralization,dewatering, phase separation, or component separation </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">d. After prior approval of the Director, addition of a new tank thatwill operate for up to 90 days using any of the following physical or chemicaltreatment technologies: neutralization, dewatering, phase separation, orcomponent separation</ITAG><D/>\1\ 1<ITAG tagnum="2">2. Modification of a tank unit or secondary containment system withoutincreasing the capacity of the unit<D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Replacement of a tank with a tank that meets the same design standardsand has a capacity within +/^ 10% of the replaced tank provided<D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">_The capacity difference is no more than 1500 gallons,</ITAG><D> </D><ITAG tagnum="13">_The facility's permitted tank capacity is not increased, and</ITAG><D> </D><ITAG tagnum="13">_The replacement tank meets the same conditions in the permit.</ITAG><D> </D><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Modification of a tank management practice.<D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">5. Management of different wastes in tanks:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. That require additional or different management practices, tankdesign, different fire protection specifications, or significantly differenttank treatment process from that authorized in the permit</ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. That do not require additional or different management practices,tank design, different fire protection specifications, or significantlydifferent tank treatment process than authorized in the permit</ITAG><D/><T2>Note: </T2>See andSection; 270.42(g) for modification procedures to beused for the management of newly lilsted or identified wastes.H. <T3>Surface Impoundments</T3><ITAG tagnum="2">1. Modification or addition of surface impoundment units that resultin increasing the facility's surface impoundment storage or treatment capacity<D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">2. Replacement of a surface impoundment unit<D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Modification of a surface impoundment unit without increasing thefacility's surface impoundment storage or treatment capacity and withoutmodifying the unit's liner, leak detection system, or leachate collectionsystem<D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Modification of a surface impoundment management practice<D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">5. Treatment, storage, or disposal of different wastes in surfaceimpoundments:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. That require additional or different management practices or differentdesign of the liner or leak detection system than authorized in the permit</ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. That do not require additional or different management practicesor different design of the liner or leak detection system than authorizedin the permit</ITAG><D/><T2>Note: </T2>See andSection; 270.42(g) for modification procedures to beused for the management of newly listed or identified wastesI. <T3>Enclosed Waste Piles. </T3>For all waste piles except those complyingwith andSection; 264.250(c), modifications are treated the same as for alandfill. The following modifications are applicable only to waste pilescomplying with andSection; 264.250(c).<ITAG tagnum="12">1. Modification or addition of waste pile units:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Resulting in greater than 25% increase in the facility's waste pilestorage or treatment capacity</ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Resulting in up to 25% increase in the facility's waste pile storageor treatment capacity </ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="2">2. Modification of waste pile unit without increasing the capacityof the unit <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Replacement of a waste pile unit with another waste pile unit ofthe same design and capacity and meeting all waste pile conditions in thepermit <D/>1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Modification of a waste pile management practice <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">5. Storage or treatment of different wastes in waste piles:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. That require additional or different management practices or differentdesign of the unit </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. That do not require additional or different management practicesor different design of the unit </ITAG><D/>2 <T2>Note: </T2>See andSection;270.42(g) for modification procedures to beused for the management of newly listed or identified wastes.J. <T3>Landfills and Unenclosed Waste Piles</T3><ITAG tagnum="2">1. Modification or addition of landfill units that result in increasingthe facility's disposal capacity <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">2. Replacement of a landfill <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Addition or modification of a liner, leachate collection system,leachate detection system, run-off control, or final cover system <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Modification of a landfill unit without changing a liner, leachatecollection system, leachate detection system, run-off control, or finalcover system <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">5. Modification of a landfill management practice <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">6. Landfill different wastes: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. That require additional or different management practices, differentdesign of the liner, leachate collection system, or leachate detectionsystem </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. That do not require additional or different management practices,different design of the liner, leachate collection system, or leachatedetection system </ITAG><D/>2 <T2>Note: </T2>See andSection;270.42(g) for modification procedures to beused for the management of newly listed or identified wastes.K. <T3>Land Treatment </T3><ITAG tagnum="2">1. Lateral expansion of or other modification of a land treatment unitto increase areal extent <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">2. Modification of run-on control system <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Modify run-off control system <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Other modifications of land treatment unit component specificationsor standards required in permit <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">5. Management of different wastes in land treatment units: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. That require a change in permit operating conditions or unit designspecifications </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. That do not require a change in permit operating conditions or unitdesign specifications </ITAG><D/>2 <T2>Note: </T2>See andSection;270.42(g) for modification procedures to beused for the management of newly listed or identified wastes <ITAG tagnum="12">6. Modification of a land treatment unit management practice to: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Increase rate or change method of waste application </ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Decrease rate of waste application </ITAG><D/>1<ITAG tagnum="2">7. Modification of a land treatment unit management practice to changemeasures of pH or moisture content, or to enhance microbial or chemicalreactions <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">8. Modification of a land treatment unit management practice to growfood chain crops, to add to or replace existing permitted crops with differentfood chain crops, or to modify operating plans for distribution of animalfeeds resulting from such crops <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">9. Modification of operating practice due to detection of releasesfrom the land treatment unit pursuant to andSection;264.278(g)(2) <D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">10. Changes in the unsaturated zone monitoring system, resulting ina change to the location, depth, number of sampling points, or replaceunsaturated zone monitoring devices or components of devices with devicesor components that have specifications different from permit requirements<D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">11. Changes in the unsaturated zone monitoring system that do not resultin a change to the location, depth, number of sampling points, or thatreplace unsaturated zone monitoring devices or components of devices withdevices or components having specifications different from permit requirements<D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">12. Changes in background values for hazardous constituents in soiland soil-pore liquid <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">13. Changes in sampling, analysis, or statistical procedure <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">14. Changes in land treatment demonstration program prior to or duringthe demonstration <D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">15. Changes in any condition specified in the permit for a land treatmentunit to reflect results of the land treatment demonstration, provided performancestandards are met, and the Director's prior approval has been received<D/>\1\ 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">16. Changes to allow a second land treatment demonstration to be conductedwhen the results of the first demonstration have not shown the conditionsunder which the wastes can be treated completely, provided the conditionsfor the second demonstration are substantially the same as the conditionsfor the first demonstration and have received the prior approval of theDirector <D/>\1\ 1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">17. Changes to allow a second land treatment demonstration to be conductedwhen the results of the first demonstration have not shown the conditionsunder which the wastes can be treated completely, where the conditionsfor the second demonstration are not substantially the same as the conditionsfor the first demonstration<D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">18. Changes in vegetative cover requirements for closure<D/>2</ITAG>L. <T3>Incinerators</T3><ITAG tagnum="2">1. Changes to increase by more than 25% any of the following limitsauthorized in the permit: A thermal feed rate limit, a waste feed ratelimit, or an organic chlorine feed rate limit. The Director will requirea new trial burn to substantiate compliance with the regulatory performancestandards unless this demonstration can be made through other means<D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">2. Changes to increase by up to 25% any of the following limits authorizedin the permit: A thermal feed rate limit, a waste feed limit, or an organicchlorine feed rate limit. The Director will require a new trial burn tosubstantiate compliance with the regulatory performance standards unlessthis demonstration can be made through other means<D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">3. Modification of an incinerator unit by changing the internal sizeor geometry of the primary or secondary combustion units, by adding a primaryor secondary combustion unit, by substantially changing the design of anycomponent used to remove HCl or particulate from the combustion gases,or by changing other features of the incinerator that could affect itscapability to meet the regulatory performance standards. The Director willrequire a new trial burn to substantiate compliance with the regulatoryperformance standards unless this demonstration can be made through othermeans<D/>3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">4. Modification of an incinerator unit in a manner that would not likelyaffect the capability of the unit to meet the regulatory performance standardsbut which would change the operating conditions or monitoring requirementsspecified in the permit. The Director may require a new trial burn to demonstratecompliance with the regulatory performance standards<D/>2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">5. Operating requirements:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Modification of the limits specified in the permit for minimum combustiongas temperature, minimum combustion gas residence time, or oxygen concentrationin the secondary combustion chamber. The Director will require a new trialburn to substantiate compliance with the regulatory performance standardsunless this demonstration can be made through other means</ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Modification of any stack gas emission limits specified in the permit,or modification of any conditions in the permit concerning emergency shutdownor automatic waste feed cutoff procedures or controls</ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">c. Modification of any other operating condition or any inspectionor recordkeeping requirement specified in the permit</ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="12">6. Incineration of different wastes:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. If the waste contains a POHC that is more difficult to incineratethan authorized by the permit or if incineration of the waste requirescompliance with different regulatory performance standards than specifiedin the permit. The Director will require a new trial burn to substantiatecompliance with the regulatory performance standards unless this demonstrationcan be made through other means</ITAG><D/>3<ITAG tagnum="3">b. If the waste does not contain a POHC that is more difficult to incineratethan authorized by the permit and if incineration of the waste does notrequire compliance with different regulatory performance standards thanspecified in the permit</ITAG><T2>Note: </T2>See andSection; 270.42(g) for modification procedures to beused for the management of newly listed or identified wastes.<ITAG tagnum="12">7. Shakedown and trial burn:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">a. Modification of the trial burn plan or any of the permit conditionsapplicable during the shakedown period for determining operational readinessafter construction, the trial burn period, or the period immediately followingthe trial burn</ITAG><D/>2<ITAG tagnum="3">b. Authorization of up to an additional 720 hours of waste incinerationduring the shakedown period for determining operational readiness afterconstruction, with the prior approval of the Director</ITAG><D/>\1\1<ITAG tagnum="3">c. Changes in the operating requirements set in the permit for conductinga trial burn, provided the change is minor and has received the prior approvalof the Director</ITAG><D/>\1\1<ITAG tagnum="3">d. Changes in the ranges of the operating requirements set in the permitto reflect the results of the trial burn, provided the change is minorand has received the prior approval of the Director</ITAG><D/>\1\1<ITAG tagnum="2">8. Substitution of an alternate type of fuel that is not specifiedin the permit<D/>1<F>\1\ Class 1 modifications requiring prior Agency approval.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-21903 Filed 9-27-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>